Ohio, session 136, HB935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 149.43, 2101.24, 2108.90, 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.401, 5122.01, 5122.02, 5122.03, 5122.05, 5122.09, 5122.10, 5122.11, 5122.111, 5122.112, 5122.12, 5122.13, 5122.14, 5122.141, 5122.15, 5122.20, 5122.23, 5122.25, 5122.26, 5122.27, 5122.271, 5122.29, 5122.31, 5122.311, 5122.35, 5122.36, 5122.38, 5122.41, 5122.43, 5123.01, 5123.21, 5123.39, 5123.57, 5123.58, 5123.61, 5123.70, 5123.71, 5123.73, 5123.74, 5123.75, 5123.76, 5123.79, 5123.81, 5123.811, 5123.86, 5123.89, 5123.92, 5123.95, 5123.96, and 5123.97 be amended and section 5122.051 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 149.43. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public record" means records kept by any public office, including, but not limited to, state, county, city, village, township, and school district units, and records pertaining to the delivery of educational services by an alternative school in this state kept by the nonprofit or for-profit entity operating the alternative school pursuant to section 3313.533 of the Revised Code. "Public record" does not mean any of the following: (a) Medical records; (b) Records pertaining to probation and parole proceedings, to proceedings related to the imposition of community control sanctions and post-release control sanctions, or to proceedings related to determinations under section 2967.271 of the Revised Code regarding the release or maintained incarceration of an offender to whom that section applies; (c) Records pertaining to actions under section 2151.85 and division (C) of section 2919.121 of the Revised Code and to appeals of actions arising under those sections; (d) Records pertaining to adoption proceedings, including the contents of an adoption file maintained by the department of health under sections 3705.12 to 3705.124 of the Revised Code; (e) Information in a record contained in the putative father registry established by section 3107.062 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the information is held by the department of children and youth or, pursuant to section 3111.69 of the Revised Code, the office of child support in the department of job and family services or a child support enforcement agency; (f) Records specified in division (A) of section 3107.52 of the Revised Code; (g) Trial preparation records, prior to the conclusion of all direct appeals or, if no appeal is filed, prior to the expiration of the time during which an appeal may be filed, or, if no trial has occurred, until the civil or criminal action or proceeding has ended without the possibility of direct appeal or each agency, office, or official responsible for the matter has made a decision not to proceed with the matter; (h) Confidential law enforcement investigatory records; (i) Records containing information that is confidential under section 2710.03 or 4112.05 of the Revised Code; (j) DNA records stored in the DNA database pursuant to section 109.573 of the Revised Code; (k) Inmate records under section 5120.21 of the Revised Code, except for permitted disclosure of the information listed in division (E)(1) of that section; (l) Records maintained by the department of youth services pertaining to children in its custody released by the department of youth services to the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to section 5139.05 of the Revised Code; (m) Intellectual property records; (n) Donor profile records; (o) Records maintained by the department of job and family services pursuant to section 3121.894 of the Revised Code; (p) Designated public service worker residential and familial information; (q) In the case of a county hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 339. of the Revised Code or a municipal hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 749. of the Revised Code, information that constitutes a trade secret, as defined in section 1333.61 of the Revised Code; (r) Information pertaining to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen; (s) In the case of a child fatality review board acting under sections 307.621 to 307.629 of the Revised Code or a review conducted pursuant to guidelines established by the director of health under section 3701.70 of the Revised Code, records provided to the board or director, statements made by board members during meetings of the board or by persons participating in the director's review, and all work products of the board or director, and in the case of a child fatality review board, child fatality review data submitted by the board to the department of health or a national child death review database, other than the report prepared pursuant to division (A) of section 307.626 of the Revised Code; (t) Records provided to and statements made by the executive director of a public children services agency or a prosecuting attorney acting pursuant to section 5153.171 of the Revised Code other than the information released under that section; (u) Test materials, examinations, or evaluation tools used in an examination for licensure as a nursing home administrator that the board of executives of long-term services and supports administers under section 4751.15 of the Revised Code or contracts under that section with a private or government entity to administer; (v) Records the release of which is prohibited by state or federal law; (w) Proprietary information of or relating to any person that is submitted to or compiled by the Ohio venture capital authority created under section 150.01 of the Revised Code; (x) Financial statements and data any person submits for any purpose to the Ohio housing finance agency or the controlling board in connection with applying for, receiving, or accounting for financial assistance from the agency, and information that identifies any individual who benefits directly or indirectly from financial assistance from the agency; (y) Records listed in section 5101.29 of the Revised Code; (z) Discharges recorded with a county recorder under section 317.24 of the Revised Code, as specified in division (B)(2) of that section; (aa) Usage information including names and addresses of specific residential and commercial customers of a municipally owned or operated public utility; (bb) Records described in division (C) of section 187.04 of the Revised Code that are not designated to be made available to the public as provided in that division; (cc) Information and records that are made confidential, privileged, and not subject to disclosure under divisions (B) and (C) of section 2949.221 of the Revised Code; (dd) Personal information, as defined in section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (ee) The confidential name, address, and other personally identifiable information of a program participant in the address confidentiality program established under sections 111.41 to 111.47 of the Revised Code, including the contents of any application for absent voter's ballots, absent voter's ballot identification envelope statement of voter, or provisional ballot affirmation completed by a program participant who has a confidential voter registration record; records or portions of records pertaining to that program that identify the number of program participants that reside within a precinct, ward, township, municipal corporation, county, or any other geographic area smaller than the state; and any real property confidentiality notice filed under section 111.431 of the Revised Code and the information described in division (C) of that section. As used in this division, "confidential address" and "program participant" have the meaning defined in section 111.41 of the Revised Code. (ff) Orders for active military service of an individual serving or with previous service in the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component, or the Ohio organized militia, except that, such order becomes a public record on the day that is fifteen years after the published date or effective date of the call to order; (gg) The name, address, contact information, or other personal information of an individual who is less than eighteen years of age that is included in any record related to a traffic accident involving a school vehicle in which the individual was an occupant at the time of the accident; (hh) Protected health information, as defined in 45 C.F.R. 160.103, that is in a claim for payment for a health care product, service, or procedure, as well as any other health claims data in another document that reveals the identity of an individual who is the subject of the data or could be used to reveal that individual's identity; (ii) Any depiction by photograph, film, videotape, or printed or digital image under either of the following circumstances: (i) The depiction is that of a victim of an offense the release of which would be, to a reasonable person of ordinary sensibilities, an offensive and objectionable intrusion into the victim's expectation of bodily privacy and integrity. (ii) The depiction captures or depicts the victim of a sexually oriented offense, as defined in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code, at the actual occurrence of that offense. (jj) Restricted portions of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording; (kk) In the case of a fetal-infant mortality review board acting under sections 3707.70 to 3707.77 of the Revised Code, records, documents, reports, or other information presented to the board or a person abstracting such materials on the board's behalf, statements made by review board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health or a national infant death review database, other than the report prepared pursuant to section 3707.77 of the Revised Code. (ll) Records, documents, reports, or other information presented to the pregnancy-associated mortality review board established under section 5180.27 of the Revised Code, statements made by board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health, other than the biennial reports prepared under section 5180.277 of the Revised Code; (mm) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(1)(oo) of this section, telephone numbers for a victim, as defined in section 2930.01 of the Revised Code or a witness to a crime that are listed on any law enforcement record or report. (nn) A preneed funeral contract, as defined in section 4717.01 of the Revised Code, and contract terms and personally identifying information of a preneed funeral contract, that is contained in a report submitted by or for a funeral home to the board of embalmers and funeral directors under division (C) of section 4717.13, division (J) of section 4717.31, or section 4717.41 of the Revised Code. (oo) Telephone numbers for a party to a motor vehicle accident subject to the requirements of section 5502.11 of the Revised Code that are listed on any law enforcement record or report, except that the telephone numbers described in this division are not excluded from the definition of "public record" under this division on and after the thirtieth day after the occurrence of the motor vehicle accident. (pp) Records pertaining to individuals who complete training under section 5502.703 of the Revised Code to be permitted by a school district board of education or governing body of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or a chartered nonpublic school to convey deadly weapons or dangerous ordnance into a school safety zone; (qq) Records, documents, reports, or other information presented to a domestic violence fatality review board established under section 307.651 of the Revised Code, statements made by board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health, other than a report prepared pursuant to section 307.656 of the Revised Code; (rr) Records, documents, and information the release of which is prohibited under sections 2930.04 and 2930.07 of the Revised Code; (ss) Records of an existing qualified nonprofit corporation that creates a special improvement district under Chapter 1710. of the Revised Code that do not pertain to a purpose for which the district is created; (tt) Educational support services data, as defined in section 3319.325 of the Revised Code; (uu) Records of the past, current, and future work schedule of a designated public service worker. As used in division (A)(1)(uu) of this section, "work schedule" does not include the docket of cases of a court, judge, or magistrate; (vv) A request form or confirmation letter submitted to a public office under section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (ww) An affidavit or confirmation letter submitted under section 319.28 of the Revised Code; (xx) License or certificate application or renewal responses and supporting documentation submitted to the state medical board regarding an applicant's, or a license or certificate holder's, inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of a medical condition; (yy) Images and data captured by an automated license plate recognition system that are maintained in a law enforcement database; (zz) Attorney work product record; (aaa) Any entry on the public calendar of an elected official that is for any date that is after the date the record is requested; (bbb) Records pertaining to burial sites under section 149.3010 of the Revised Code. A record that is not a public record under division (A)(1) of this section and that, under law, is permanently retained becomes a public record on the day that is seventy-five years after the day on which the record was created, or in the case of a record that is not a public record under division (A)(1)(uu) of this section that is retained, three years after the day on which the record was created, except for any record protected by the attorney-client privilege, a trial preparation record as defined in this section, a statement prohibiting the release of identifying information signed under section 3107.083 of the Revised Code, a denial of release form filed pursuant to section 3107.46 of the Revised Code, records pertaining to burial sites under section 149.3010 of the Revised Code, or any record that is exempt from release or disclosure under section 149.433 of the Revised Code. If the record is a birth certificate and a biological parent's name redaction request form has been accepted under section 3107.391 of the Revised Code, the name of that parent shall be redacted from the birth certificate before it is released under this paragraph. If any other section of the Revised Code establishes a time period for disclosure of a record that conflicts with the time period specified in this section, the time period in the other section prevails. (2)(a) "Confidential law enforcement investigatory record" means any record that pertains to a law enforcement matter of a criminal, quasi-criminal, civil, or administrative nature, but only to the extent that the release of the record would create a high probability of disclosure of any of the following: (i) The identity of a suspect who has not been charged with the offense to which the record pertains, or of an information source or witness to whom confidentiality has been reasonably promised; (ii) Information provided by an information source or witness to whom confidentiality has been reasonably promised, which information would reasonably tend to disclose the source's or witness's identity; (iii) Specific confidential investigatory techniques or procedures or specific investigatory work product; (iv) Information that would endanger the life or physical safety of law enforcement personnel, a crime victim, a witness, or a confidential information source. (b) As used in divisions (A)(2) and (18) of this section, "specific investigatory work product" means information assembled by law enforcement officials in connection with a probable or pending criminal or civil proceeding, with the exception of routine incident reports. "Specific investigatory work product" is not a public record prior to the conclusion of all direct appeals, or, if no appeal is filed, prior to the expiration of the time during which an appeal may be filed, or, if no trial has occurred, until the criminal or civil proceeding has ended without possibility of direct appeal or each agency, office, or official responsible for the matter has made a decision not to proceed with the matter. (3) "Medical record" means any document or combination of documents, except births, deaths, and the fact of admission to or discharge from a hospital, that pertains to the medical history, diagnosis, prognosis, or medical condition of a patient and that is generated and maintained in the process of medical treatment. (4) "Trial preparation record" means any record created by or for another party or by or for that party's representative, in reasonable anticipation of, or in defense of, a civil or criminal action or proceeding, that is not a confidential law enforcement investigatory record or attorney work product record and that contains factual information that is specifically compiled for that civil or criminal action or proceeding. (5) "Intellectual property record" means a record, other than a financial or administrative record, that is produced or collected by or for faculty or staff of a state institution of higher learning in the conduct of or as a result of study or research on an educational, commercial, scientific, artistic, technical, or scholarly issue, regardless of whether the study or research was sponsored by the institution alone or in conjunction with a governmental body or private concern, and that has not been publicly released, published, or patented. (6) "Donor profile record" means all records about donors or potential donors to a public institution of higher education except the names and reported addresses of the actual donors and the date, amount, and conditions of the actual donation. (7) "Designated public service worker" means a peace officer, parole officer, probation officer, bailiff, prosecuting attorney, assistant prosecuting attorney, correctional employee, county or multicounty corrections officer, community-based correctional facility employee, designated Ohio national guard member, protective services worker, youth services employee, firefighter, EMT, medical director or member of a cooperating physician advisory board of an emergency medical service organization, state board of pharmacy employee, investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, emergency service telecommunicator, forensic mental health provider, mental health evaluation provider, regional psychiatric hospital employee, judge, magistrate, or federal law enforcement officer. (8) "Designated public service worker residential and familial information" means any information that discloses any of the following about a designated public service worker: (a) The address of the actual personal residence of a designated public service worker, except for the following information: (i) The address of the actual personal residence of a prosecuting attorney or judge; and (ii) The state or political subdivision in which a designated public service worker resides. (b) Information compiled from referral to or participation in an employee assistance program; (c) The social security number, the residential telephone number, any bank account, debit card, charge card, or credit card number, or the emergency telephone number of, or any medical information pertaining to, a designated public service worker; (d) The name of any beneficiary of employment benefits, including, but not limited to, life insurance benefits, provided to a designated public service worker by the designated public service worker's employer; (e) The identity and amount of any charitable or employment benefit deduction made by the designated public service worker's employer from the designated public service worker's compensation, unless the amount of the deduction is required by state or federal law; (f) The name, the residential address, the name of the employer, the address of the employer, the social security number, the residential telephone number, any bank account, debit card, charge card, or credit card number, or the emergency telephone number of the spouse, a former spouse, or any child of a designated public service worker; (g) A photograph of a peace officer who holds a position or has an assignment that may include undercover or plain clothes positions or assignments as determined by the peace officer's appointing authority. (9) As used in divisions (A)(7) and (15) to (17) of this section: "Peace officer" has the meaning defined in section 109.71 of the Revised Code and also includes the superintendent and troopers of the state highway patrol; it does not include the sheriff of a county or a supervisory employee who, in the absence of the sheriff, is authorized to stand in for, exercise the authority of, and perform the duties of the sheriff. "Correctional employee" means any employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction who in the course of performing the employee's job duties has or has had contact with inmates and persons under supervision. "County or multicounty corrections officer" means any corrections officer employed by any county or multicounty correctional facility. "Designated Ohio national guard member" means a member of the Ohio national guard who is participating in duties related to remotely piloted aircraft, including, but not limited to, pilots, sensor operators, and mission intelligence personnel, duties related to special forces operations, or duties related to cybersecurity, and is designated by the adjutant general as a designated public service worker for those purposes. "Protective services worker" means any employee of a county agency who is responsible for child protective services, child support services, or adult protective services. "Youth services employee" means any employee of the department of youth services who in the course of performing the employee's job duties has or has had contact with children committed to the custody of the department of youth services. "Firefighter" means any regular, paid or volunteer, member of a lawfully constituted fire department of a municipal corporation, township, fire district, or village. "EMT" means EMTs-basic, EMTs-I, and paramedics that provide emergency medical services for a public emergency medical service organization. "Emergency medical service organization," "EMT-basic," "EMT-I," and "paramedic" have the meanings defined in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. "Investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation" has the meaning defined in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code. "Emergency service telecommunicator" means an individual employed by an emergency service provider as defined under section 128.01 of the Revised Code, whose primary responsibility is to be an operator for the receipt or processing of calls for emergency services made by telephone, radio, or other electronic means. "Forensic mental health provider" means any employee of a community mental health service provider or local alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services board who, in the course of the employee's duties, has contact with persons committed to a local alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services board by a court order pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. "Mental health evaluation provider" means an individual who, under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code, examines a respondent who is alleged to be a mentally ill person subject to court order, as defined in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code, and reports to the probate court or criminal court the respondent's mental condition. "Regional psychiatric hospital employee" means any employee of the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health who, in the course of performing the employee's duties, has contact with patients committed to the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health by a court order pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. "Federal law enforcement officer" has the meaning defined in section 9.88 of the Revised Code. (10) "Information pertaining to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen" means information that is kept in the ordinary course of business by a public office, that pertains to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen years, and that discloses any of the following: (a) The address or telephone number of a person under the age of eighteen or the address or telephone number of that person's parent, guardian, custodian, or emergency contact person; (b) The social security number, birth date, or photographic image of a person under the age of eighteen; (c) Any medical record, history, or information pertaining to a person under the age of eighteen; (d) Any additional information sought or required about a person under the age of eighteen for the purpose of allowing that person to participate in any recreational activity conducted or sponsored by a public office or to use or obtain admission privileges to any recreational facility owned or operated by a public office. (11) "Community control sanction" has the meaning defined in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (12) "Post-release control sanction" has the meaning defined in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (13) "Redaction" means obscuring or deleting any information that is exempt from the duty to permit public inspection or copying from an item that otherwise meets the definition of a "record" in section 149.011 of the Revised Code. (14) "Designee," "elected official," and "future official" have the meanings defined in section 109.43 of the Revised Code. (15) "Body-worn camera" means a visual and audio recording device worn on the person of a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer while the correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer is engaged in the performance of official duties. (16) "Dashboard camera" means a visual and audio recording device mounted on a peace officer's vehicle or vessel that is used while the peace officer is engaged in the performance of the peace officer's duties. (17) "Restricted portions of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording" means any visual or audio portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording that shows, communicates, or discloses any of the following: (a) The image or identity of a child or information that could lead to the identification of a child who is a primary subject of the recording when the department of rehabilitation and correction, department of youth services, or the law enforcement agency knows or has reason to know the person is a child based on the department's or law enforcement agency's records or the content of the recording; (b) The death of a person or a deceased person's body, unless the death was caused by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the decedent's executor or administrator has been obtained; (c) The death of a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the decedent was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the decedent's executor or administrator has been obtained; (d) Grievous bodily harm, unless the injury was effected by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (e) An act of severe violence against a person that results in serious physical harm to the person, unless the act and injury was effected by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (f) Grievous bodily harm to a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the injured person was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (g) An act of severe violence resulting in serious physical harm against a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the injured person was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (h) A person's nude body, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the person's consent has been obtained; (i) Protected health information, the identity of a person in a health care facility who is not the subject of a correctional, youth services, or law enforcement encounter, or any other information in a health care facility that could identify a person who is not the subject of a correctional, youth services, or law enforcement encounter; (j) Information that could identify the alleged victim of a sex offense, menacing by stalking, or domestic violence; (k) Information, that does not constitute a confidential law enforcement investigatory record, that could identify a person who provides sensitive or confidential information to the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department of youth services, or a law enforcement agency when the disclosure of the person's identity or the information provided could reasonably be expected to threaten or endanger the safety or property of the person or another person; (l) Personal information of a person who is not arrested, cited, charged, or issued a written warning by a peace officer; (m) Proprietary correctional, youth services, or police contingency plans or tactics that are intended to prevent crime and maintain public order and safety; (n) A personal conversation unrelated to work between correctional employees, youth services employees, or peace officers or between a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer and an employee of a law enforcement agency; (o) A conversation between a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer and a member of the public that does not concern correctional, youth services, or law enforcement activities; (p) The interior of a residence, unless the interior of a residence is the location of an adversarial encounter with, or a use of force by, a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer; (q) Any portion of the interior of a private business that is not open to the public, unless an adversarial encounter with, or a use of force by, a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer occurs in that location. As used in division (A)(17) of this section: "Grievous bodily harm" has the same meaning as in section 5924.120 of the Revised Code. "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in section 1337.11 of the Revised Code. "Protected health information" has the same meaning as in 45 C.F.R. 160.103. "Law enforcement agency" means a government entity that employs peace officers to perform law enforcement duties. "Personal information" means any government-issued identification number, date of birth, address, financial information, or criminal justice information from the law enforcement automated data system or similar databases. "Sex offense" has the same meaning as in section 2907.10 of the Revised Code. "Firefighter," "paramedic," and "first responder" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (18) "Attorney work product record" means a record that is not specific investigatory work product or a trial preparation record and that is created by an attorney, or by the agent of an attorney, in reasonable anticipation of or for litigation, trial, or administrative proceedings, when acting in an official capacity on behalf of the state, a political subdivision of the state, a state agency, a public official, or a public employee, that documents the independent thought processes, mental impressions, legal theories, strategies, analysis, or reasoning of an attorney or the agent of an attorney. (19) "Elected official" means a person who is elected or appointed to an elective office of the state or a political subdivision. (20) "Public calendar" means a calendar or appointment book maintained by an elected official to schedule the elected official's activities in relation to the elected official's position as an elected official. "Public calendar" does not include a personal calendar or appointment book maintained solely for an elected official's personal convenience that does not serve to document the elected official's official activities or functions or the official activities or functions of the elected official's public office. (B)(1) Upon request by any person and subject to division (B)(8) of this section, all public records responsive to the request shall be promptly prepared and made available for inspection to the requester at all reasonable times during regular business hours. Subject to division (B)(8) of this section, upon request by any person, a public office or person responsible for public records shall make copies of the requested public record available to the requester at cost and within a reasonable period of time. When considering whether a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office promptly prepared a video record for inspection or produced a copy of a video record within a reasonable period of time, in addition to any other factors, a court shall consider the time required for a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office to retrieve, download, review, redact, seek legal advice regarding, and produce the video record. Except as specified in division (B)(11) of this section, notwithstanding any other requirement set forth in Chapter 149. of the Revised Code, a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office may charge a requester the actual cost associated with preparing a video record for inspection or production, not to exceed seventy-five dollars per hour of video produced, nor seven hundred fifty dollars total. As used in this division, "actual cost," with respect to video records only, means all costs incurred by the state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office in reviewing, blurring or otherwise obscuring, redacting, uploading, or producing the video records, including but not limited to the storage medium on which the record is produced, staff time, and any other relevant overhead necessary to comply with the request. A state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office may include in its public records policy the requirement that a requester pay the estimated actual cost before beginning the process of preparing a video record for inspection or production. Where a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office imposes such a requirement, its obligation to produce a video or make it available for inspection begins once the estimated actual cost is paid in full by the requester. A state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office shall provide the requester with the estimated actual cost within five business days of receipt of the public records request. If the actual cost exceeds the estimated actual cost, a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office may charge a requester for the difference upon fulfilling a request for video records if the requester is notified in advance that the actual cost may be up to twenty per cent higher than the estimated actual cost. A state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office shall not charge a requester a difference that exceeds twenty per cent of the estimated actual cost. If a public record contains information that is exempt from the duty to permit public inspection or to copy the public record, the public office or the person responsible for the public record shall make available all of the information within the public record that is not exempt. When making that public record available for public inspection or copying that public record, the public office or the person responsible for the public record shall notify the requester of any redaction or make the redaction plainly visible. A redaction shall be deemed a denial of a request to inspect or copy the redacted information, except if federal or state law authorizes or requires a public office to make the redaction. When the auditor of state receives a request to inspect or to make a copy of a record that was provided to the auditor of state for purposes of an audit, but the original public office has asserted to the auditor of state that the record is not a public record, the auditor of state may handle the requests by directing the requestor to the original public office that provided the record to the auditor of state. (2) To facilitate broader access to public records, a public office or the person responsible for public records shall organize and maintain public records in a manner that they can be made available for inspection or copying in accordance with division (B) of this section. A public office also shall have available a copy of its current records retention schedule at a location readily available to the public. If a requester makes an ambiguous or overly broad request or has difficulty in making a request for copies or inspection of public records under this section such that the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record cannot reasonably identify what public records are being requested, the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record may deny the request but shall provide the requester with an opportunity to revise the request by informing the requester of the manner in which records are maintained by the public office and accessed in the ordinary course of the public office's or person's duties. (3) If a request is ultimately denied, in part or in whole, the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record shall provide the requester with an explanation, including legal authority, setting forth why the request was denied. If the initial request was provided in writing, the explanation also shall be provided to the requester in writing. The explanation shall not preclude the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record from relying upon additional reasons or legal authority in defending an action commenced under division (C) of this section. (4) Unless specifically required or authorized by state or federal law or in accordance with division (B) of this section, no public office or person responsible for public records may limit or condition the availability of public records by requiring disclosure of the requester's identity or the intended use of the requested public record. Any requirement that the requester disclose the requester's identity or the intended use of the requested public record constitutes a denial of the request. (5) A public office or person responsible for public records may ask a requester to make the request in writing, may ask for the requester's identity, and may inquire about the intended use of the information requested, but may do so only after disclosing to the requester that a written request is not mandatory, that the requester may decline to reveal the requester's identity or the intended use, and when a written request or disclosure of the identity or intended use would benefit the requester by enhancing the ability of the public office or person responsible for public records to identify, locate, or deliver the public records sought by the requester. (6) If any person requests a copy of a public record in accordance with division (B) of this section, the public office or person responsible for the public record may require the requester to pay in advance the cost involved in providing the copy of the public record in accordance with the choice made by the requester under this division. The public office or the person responsible for the public record shall permit the requester to choose to have the public record duplicated upon paper, upon the same medium upon which the public office or person responsible for the public record keeps it, or upon any other medium upon which the public office or person responsible for the public record determines that it reasonably can be duplicated as an integral part of the normal operations of the public office or person responsible for the public record. When the requester makes a choice under this division, the public office or person responsible for the public record shall provide a copy of it in accordance with the choice made by the requester. Nothing in this section requires a public office or person responsible for the public record to allow the requester of a copy of the public record to make the copies of the public record. (7)(a) Upon a request made in accordance with division (B) of this section and subject to division (B)(6) of this section, a public office or person responsible for public records shall transmit a copy of a public record to any person by United States mail or by any other means of delivery or transmission within a reasonable period of time after receiving the request for the copy. The public office or person responsible for the public record may require the person making the request to pay in advance the cost of postage if the copy is transmitted by United States mail or the cost of delivery if the copy is transmitted other than by United States mail, and to pay in advance the costs incurred for other supplies used in the mailing, delivery, or transmission. (b) Any public office may adopt a policy and procedures that it will follow in transmitting, within a reasonable period of time after receiving a request, copies of public records by United States mail or by any other means of delivery or transmission pursuant to division (B)(7) of this section. A public office that adopts a policy and procedures under division (B)(7) of this section shall comply with them in performing its duties under that division. (c) In any policy and procedures adopted under division (B)(7) of this section: (i) A public office may limit the number of records requested by a person that the office will physically deliver by United States mail or by another delivery service to ten per month, unless the person certifies to the office in writing that the person does not intend to use or forward the requested records, or the information contained in them, for commercial purposes; (ii) A public office that chooses to provide some or all of its public records on a web site that is fully accessible to and searchable by members of the public at all times, other than during acts of God outside the public office's control or maintenance, and that charges no fee to search, access, download, or otherwise receive records provided on the web site, may limit to ten per month the number of records requested by a person that the office will deliver in a digital format, unless the requested records are not provided on the web site and unless the person certifies to the office in writing that the person does not intend to use or forward the requested records, or the information contained in them, for commercial purposes. (iii) For purposes of division (B)(7) of this section, "commercial" shall be narrowly construed and does not include reporting or gathering news, reporting or gathering information to assist citizen oversight or understanding of the operation or activities of government, or nonprofit educational research. (8) A public office or person responsible for public records is not required to permit a person who is incarcerated pursuant to a criminal conviction or a juvenile adjudication to inspect or to obtain a copy of any public record concerning a criminal investigation or prosecution or concerning what would be a criminal investigation or prosecution if the subject of the investigation or prosecution were an adult, unless the request to inspect or to obtain a copy of the record is for the purpose of acquiring information that is subject to release as a public record under this section and the judge who imposed the sentence or made the adjudication with respect to the person, or the judge's successor in office, finds that the information sought in the public record is necessary to support what appears to be a justiciable claim of the person. As used in this division, "public record concerning a criminal investigation or prosecution or concerning what would be a criminal investigation or prosecution if the subject of the investigation were an adult" includes, but is not limited to, personnel files and payroll and attendance records of designated public service workers. (9)(a) Upon written request made and signed by a journalist, a public office, or person responsible for public records, having custody of the records of the agency employing a specified designated public service worker shall disclose to the journalist the address of the actual personal residence of the designated public service worker and, if the designated public service worker's spouse, former spouse, or child is employed by a public office, the name and address of the employer of the designated public service worker's spouse, former spouse, or child, and any past, current, and future work schedules of the designated public service worker. The request shall include the journalist's name and title and the name and address of the journalist's employer and shall state that disclosure of the information sought would be in the public interest. (b) Division (B)(9)(a) of this section also applies to journalist requests for: (i) Customer information maintained by a municipally owned or operated public utility, other than social security numbers and any private financial information such as credit reports, payment methods, credit card numbers, and bank account information; (ii) Information about minors involved in a school vehicle accident as provided in division (A)(1)(gg) of this section, other than personal information as defined in section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (iii) A request form submitted to a public office under section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (iv) An affidavit submitted under section 319.28 of the Revised Code. (c) As used in division (B)(9) of this section, "journalist" means a person engaged in, connected with, or employed by any news medium, including a newspaper, magazine, press association, news agency, or wire service, a radio or television station, or a similar medium, for the purpose of gathering, processing, transmitting, compiling, editing, or disseminating information for the general public. (10) Upon a request made by a victim, victim's attorney, or victim's representative, as that term is used in section 2930.02 of the Revised Code, a public office or person responsible for public records shall transmit a copy of a depiction of the victim as described in division (A)(1)(ii) of this section to the victim, victim's attorney, or victim's representative. (11) A state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office shall not charge a fee for preparing a video record for inspection, or producing a copy of a video record, when the requester of the video record is a victim, as defined in Ohio Constitution, Article I, Section 10a, or who is a victim who suffered loss and could seek remedy through a tort action as defined by section 2307.011 of the Revised Code, who reasonably asserts that the video recording relates to the act or omission that caused the victim's harm or loss, or who is the legal counsel or insurer of the victim. A fee under this section may only be waived upon the receipt of an affidavit by the victim or the victim's legal counsel identifying that the use of the video is to investigate harm or damages that may have been captured on the video. As used in this division, "legal counsel of the victim" means an attorney who, at the time of making the request, produces to the state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office a signed retention agreement or letter of representation that establishes that the attorney is representing the victim. (C)(1) If a person allegedly is aggrieved by the failure of a public office or the person responsible for public records to promptly prepare a public record and to make it available to the person for inspection in accordance with division (B) of this section or by any other failure of a public office or the person responsible for public records to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section, the person allegedly aggrieved may serve pursuant to Rule 4 of the Ohio Rules of Civil Procedure a complaint, on a form prescribed by the clerk of the court of claims, to the public office or person responsible for public records allegedly responsible for the alleged failure. Upon receipt of the complaint of the person allegedly aggrieved, the public office or person responsible for public records has three business days to cure or otherwise address the failure alleged in the complaint. The person allegedly aggrieved shall not file a complaint with a court or commence a mandamus action under this section within the three-day period. Upon the expiration of the three-day period, the person allegedly aggrieved may, subject to the requirements of division (C)(2) of this section, do only one of the following, and not both: (a) File a complaint with the clerk of the court of claims or the clerk of the court of common pleas under section 2743.75 of the Revised Code; (b) Commence a mandamus action to obtain a judgment that orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section, that awards court costs and reasonable attorney's fees to the person that instituted the mandamus action, and, if applicable, that includes an order fixing statutory damages under division (C)(3) of this section. The mandamus action may be commenced in the court of common pleas of the county in which division (B) of this section allegedly was not complied with, in the supreme court pursuant to its original jurisdiction under Section 2 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution, or in the court of appeals for the appellate district in which division (B) of this section allegedly was not complied with pursuant to its original jurisdiction under Section 3 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution. (2) Upon filing a complaint or mandamus action with a court under divisions (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section, a person allegedly aggrieved shall file with the court, in conjunction with the person's complaint or petition, a written affirmation stating that the person properly transmitted a complaint to the public office or person responsible for public records, the failure alleged in the complaint has not been cured or otherwise resolved to the person's satisfaction, and that the complaint was transmitted to the public office or person responsible for public records at least three business days before the filing of the suit. If the person fails to file an affirmation pursuant to this division, the suit shall be dismissed. (3) If a requester transmits a written request by hand delivery, electronic submission, or certified mail to inspect or receive copies of any public record in a manner that fairly describes the public record or class of public records to the public office or person responsible for the requested public records, except as otherwise provided in this section, the requester shall be entitled to recover the amount of statutory damages set forth in this division if a court determines that the public office or the person responsible for public records failed to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section. Statutory damages are not available pursuant to this section to a person committed to the custody of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the United States bureau of prisons, or a child committed to the department of youth services as permitted in Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code. The amount of statutory damages shall be fixed at one hundred dollars for each business day during which the public office or person responsible for the requested public records failed to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section, beginning with the day on which the requester files a mandamus action to recover statutory damages, up to a maximum of one thousand dollars. The award of statutory damages shall not be construed as a penalty, but as compensation for injury arising from lost use of the requested information. The existence of this injury shall be conclusively presumed. The award of statutory damages shall be in addition to all other remedies authorized by this section. The court may reduce an award of statutory damages or not award statutory damages if the court determines both of the following: (a) That, based on the ordinary application of statutory law and case law as it existed at the time of the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records that allegedly constitutes a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section and that was the basis of the mandamus action, a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records did not constitute a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section; (b) That a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records would serve the public policy that underlies the authority that is asserted as permitting that conduct or threatened conduct. (4) In a mandamus action filed under division (C)(1) of this section, the following apply: (a)(i) If the court orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section, the court shall determine and award to the relator all court costs, which shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (ii) If the court makes a determination described in division (C)(4)(b)(iii) of this section, the court shall determine and award to the relator all court costs, which shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (b) If the court renders a judgment that orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section or if the court determines any of the following, the court may award reasonable attorney's fees to the relator, subject to division (C)(5) of this section: (i) The public office or the person responsible for the public records failed to respond affirmatively or negatively to the public records request in accordance with the time allowed under division (B) of this section. (ii) The public office or the person responsible for the public records promised to permit the relator to inspect or receive copies of the public records requested within a specified period of time but failed to fulfill that promise within that specified period of time. (iii) The public office or the person responsible for the public records acted in bad faith when the office or person voluntarily made the public records available to the relator for the first time after the relator commenced the mandamus action, but before the court issued any order concluding whether or not the public office or person was required to comply with division (B) of this section. No discovery may be conducted on the issue of the alleged bad faith of the public office or person responsible for the public records. This division shall not be construed as creating a presumption that the public office or the person responsible for the public records acted in bad faith when the office or person voluntarily made the public records available to the relator for the first time after the relator commenced the mandamus action, but before the court issued any order described in this division. (c) The court shall not award attorney's fees to the relator if the court determines both of the following: (i) That, based on the ordinary application of statutory law and case law as it existed at the time of the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records that allegedly constitutes a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section and that was the basis of the mandamus action, a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records did not constitute a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section; (ii) That a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records would serve the public policy that underlies the authority that is asserted as permitting that conduct or threatened conduct. (5) All of the following apply to any award of reasonable attorney's fees awarded under division (C)(4)(b) of this section: (a) The fees shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (b) The fees awarded shall not exceed the total of the reasonable attorney's fees incurred before the public record was made available to the relator and the fees described in division (C)(5)(c) of this section. (c) Reasonable attorney's fees shall include reasonable fees incurred to produce proof of the reasonableness and amount of the fees and to otherwise litigate entitlement to the fees. (d) The court may reduce the amount of fees awarded if the court determines that, given the factual circumstances involved with the specific public records request, an alternative means should have been pursued to more effectively and efficiently resolve the dispute that was subject to the mandamus action filed under division (C)(1) of this section. (6) If the court does not issue a writ of mandamus under division (C) of this section and the court determines at that time that the bringing of the mandamus action was frivolous conduct as defined in division (A) of section 2323.51 of the Revised Code, the court may award to the public office all court costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees, as determined by the court. (D) Chapter 1347. of the Revised Code does not limit the provisions of this section. (E)(1) To ensure that all employees of public offices are appropriately educated about a public office's obligations under division (B) of this section, all elected officials or their appropriate designees shall attend training approved by the attorney general as provided in section 109.43 of the Revised Code. A future official may satisfy the requirements of this division by attending the training before taking office, provided that the future official may not send a designee in the future official's place. (2) All public offices shall adopt a public records policy in compliance with this section for responding to public records requests. In adopting a public records policy under this division, a public office may obtain guidance from the model public records policy developed and provided to the public office by the attorney general under section 109.43 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the policy may not limit the number of public records that the public office will make available to a single person, may not limit the number of public records that it will make available during a fixed period of time, and may not establish a fixed period of time before it will respond to a request for inspection or copying of public records, unless that period is less than eight hours. The public office shall distribute the public records policy adopted by the public office under this division to the employee of the public office who is the records custodian or records manager or otherwise has custody of the records of that office. The public office shall require that employee to acknowledge receipt of the copy of the public records policy. The public office shall create a poster that describes its public records policy and shall post the poster in a conspicuous place in the public office and in all locations where the public office has branch offices. The public office may post its public records policy on the internet web site of the public office if the public office maintains an internet web site. A public office that has established a manual or handbook of its general policies and procedures for all employees of the public office shall include the public records policy of the public office in the manual or handbook. (F)(1) The bureau of motor vehicles may adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to reasonably limit the number of bulk commercial special extraction requests made by a person for the same records or for updated records during a calendar year. The rules may include provisions for charges to be made for bulk commercial special extraction requests for the actual cost of the bureau, plus special extraction costs, plus ten per cent. The bureau may charge for expenses for redacting information, the release of which is prohibited by law. (2) As used in division (F)(1) of this section: (a) "Actual cost" means the cost of depleted supplies, records storage media costs, actual mailing and alternative delivery costs, or other transmitting costs, and any direct equipment operating and maintenance costs, including actual costs paid to private contractors for copying services. (b) "Bulk commercial special extraction request" means a request for copies of a record for information in a format other than the format already available, or information that cannot be extracted without examination of all items in a records series, class of records, or database by a person who intends to use or forward the copies for surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes. "Bulk commercial special extraction request" does not include a request by a person who gives assurance to the bureau that the person making the request does not intend to use or forward the requested copies for surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes. (c) "Commercial" means profit-seeking production, buying, or selling of any good, service, or other product. (d) "Special extraction costs" means the cost of the time spent by the lowest paid employee competent to perform the task, the actual amount paid to outside private contractors employed by the bureau, or the actual cost incurred to create computer programs to make the special extraction. "Special extraction costs" include any charges paid to a public agency for computer or records services. (3) For purposes of divisions (F)(1) and (2) of this section, "surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes" shall be narrowly construed and does not include reporting or gathering news, reporting or gathering information to assist citizen oversight or understanding of the operation or activities of government, or nonprofit educational research. (G) A request by a defendant, counsel of a defendant, or any agent of a defendant in a criminal action that public records related to that action be made available under this section shall be considered a demand for discovery pursuant to the Criminal Rules, except to the extent that the Criminal Rules plainly indicate a contrary intent. The defendant, counsel of the defendant, or agent of the defendant making a request under this division shall serve a copy of the request on the prosecuting attorney, director of law, or other chief legal officer responsible for prosecuting the action. (H)(1) Any portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording described in divisions (A)(17)(b) to (h) of this section may be released by consent of the subject of the recording or a representative of that person, as specified in those divisions, only if either of the following applies: (a) The recording will not be used in connection with any probable or pending criminal proceedings; (b) The recording has been used in connection with a criminal proceeding that was dismissed or for which a judgment has been entered pursuant to Rule 32 of the Rules of Criminal Procedure, and will not be used again in connection with any probable or pending criminal proceedings. (2) If a public office denies a request to release a restricted portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording, as defined in division (A)(17) of this section, any person may file a mandamus action pursuant to this section or a complaint with the clerk of the court of claims pursuant to section 2743.75 of the Revised Code, requesting the court to order the release of all or portions of the recording. If the court considering the request determines that the filing articulates by clear and convincing evidence that the public interest in the recording substantially outweighs privacy interests and other interests asserted to deny release, the court shall order the public office to release the recording. Sec. 2101.24. (A)(1)(A) "Criminal court" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, the probate court has exclusive jurisdiction: (a) To take the proof of wills and to admit to record authenticated copies of wills executed, proved, and allowed in the courts of any other state, territory, or country. If the probate judge is unavoidably absent, any judge of the court of common pleas may take proof of wills and approve bonds to be given, but the record of these acts shall be preserved in the usual records of the probate court. (b) To grant and revoke letters testamentary and of administration; (c) To direct and control the conduct and settle the accounts of executors and administrators and order the distribution of estates; (d) To appoint the attorney general to serve as the administrator of an estate pursuant to section 2113.06 of the Revised Code; (e) To appoint and remove guardians, conservators, and testamentary trustees, direct and control their conduct, and settle their accounts; (f) To grant marriage licenses; (g) To make inquests respecting persons who are so mentally impaired as a result of a mental or physical illness or disability, as a result of intellectual disability, or as a result of chronic substance abuse, that they are unable to manage their property and affairs effectively, subject to guardianship; (h) To qualify assignees, appoint and qualify trustees and commissioners of insolvents, control their conduct, and settle their accounts; (i) To authorize the sale of lands, equitable estates, or interests in lands or equitable estates, and the assignments of inchoate dower in such cases of sale, on petition by executors, administrators, and guardians; (j) To authorize the completion of real property contracts on petition of executors and administrators; (k) To construe wills; (l) To render declaratory judgments, including, but not limited to, those rendered pursuant to Chapter 5817. of the Revised Code; (m) To direct and control the conduct of fiduciaries and settle their accounts; (n) To authorize the sale or lease of any estate created by will if the estate is held in trust, on petition by the trustee; (o) To terminate a testamentary trust in any case in which a court of equity may do so; (p) To hear and determine actions to contest the validity of wills; (q) To make a determination of the presumption of death of missing persons and to adjudicate the property rights and obligations of all parties affected by the presumption; (r) To act for and issue orders regarding wards pursuant to section 2111.50 of the Revised Code; (s) To hear and determine actions against sureties on the bonds of fiduciaries appointed by the probate court; (t) To hear and determine actions involving informed consent for medication of persons hospitalized pursuant to section 5122.141 or 5122.15 of the Revised Code; (u) To hear and determine actions relating to durable powers of attorney for health care as described in division (D) of section 1337.16 of the Revised Code; (v)(u) To hear and determine actions commenced by objecting individuals, in accordance with section 2133.05 of the Revised Code; (w)(v) To hear and determine complaints that pertain to the use or continuation, or the withholding or withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment in connection with certain patients allegedly in a terminal condition or in a permanently unconscious state pursuant to division (E) of section 2133.08 of the Revised Code, in accordance with that division; (x)(w) To hear and determine applications that pertain to the withholding or withdrawal of nutrition and hydration from certain patients allegedly in a permanently unconscious state pursuant to section 2133.09 of the Revised Code, in accordance with that section; (y)(x) To hear and determine applications of attending physicians in accordance with division (B) of section 2133.15 of the Revised Code; (z)(y) To hear and determine actions relative to the use or continuation of comfort care in connection with certain principals under durable powers of attorney for health care, declarants under declarations, or patients in accordance with division (E) of either section 1337.16 or 2133.12 of the Revised Code; (aa)(z) To hear and determine applications for an order relieving an estate from administration under section 2113.03 of the Revised Code; (bb)(aa) To hear and determine applications for an order granting a summary release from administration under section 2113.031 of the Revised Code; (cc)(bb) To hear and determine actions relating to the exercise of the right of disposition, in accordance with section 2108.90 of the Revised Code; (dd)(cc) To hear and determine actions relating to the disinterment and reinterment of human remains under section 517.23 of the Revised Code; (ee)(dd) To hear and determine petitions for an order for treatment of a person experiencing alcohol and other drug abuse filed under section 5119.93 of the Revised Code and to order treatment of that nature in accordance with, and take other actions afforded to the court under, sections 5119.90 to 5119.98 of the Revised Code; (ff)(ee) To hear and determine petitions for adoption. (2) In addition to the exclusive jurisdiction conferred upon the probate court by division (A)(1)(B)(1) of this section, the probate court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over a particular subject matter if both of the following apply: (a) Another section of the Revised Code expressly confers jurisdiction over that subject matter upon the probate court. (b) No section of the Revised Code expressly confers jurisdiction over that subject matter upon any other court or agency. (B)(1)(C)(1) The probate court has concurrent jurisdiction with, and the same powers at law and in equity as, the general division of the court of common pleas to issue writs and orders, and to hear and determine actions as follows: (a) If jurisdiction relative to a particular subject matter is stated to be concurrent in a section of the Revised Code or has been construed by judicial decision to be concurrent, any action that involves that subject matter; (b) Any action that involves an inter vivos trust; a trust created pursuant to section 5815.28 of the Revised Code; a charitable trust or foundation; subject to divisions (A)(1)(t) and (y)division (B)(1)(x) of this section, a power of attorney, including, but not limited to, a durable power of attorney; the medical treatment of a competent adult; or a writ of habeas corpus; (c) Subject to section 2101.31 of the Revised Code, any action with respect to a probate estate, guardianship, trust, or post-death dispute that involves any of the following: (i) A designation or removal of a beneficiary of a life insurance policy, annuity contract, retirement plan, brokerage account, security account, bank account, real property, or tangible personal property; (ii) A designation or removal of a payable-on-death beneficiary or transfer-on-death beneficiary; (iii) A change in the title to any asset involving a joint and survivorship interest; (iv) An alleged gift; (v) The passing of assets upon the death of an individual otherwise than by will, intestate succession, or trust. (2) Any action that involves a concurrent jurisdiction subject matter and that is before the probate court may be transferred by the probate court, on its order, to the general division of the court of common pleas. (3) Notwithstanding that the probate court has exclusive jurisdiction to render declaratory judgments under Chapter 5817. of the Revised Code, the probate court may transfer the proceeding to the general division of the court of common pleas pursuant to division (A) of section 5817.04 of the Revised Code. (C)(D) The probate court has concurrent jurisdiction with the criminal court to hear and determine actions involving informed consent for medication of persons hospitalized pursuant to section 5122.141 or 5122.15 of the Revised Code. (E) The probate court has plenary power at law and in equity to dispose fully of any matter that is properly before the court, unless the power is expressly otherwise limited or denied by a section of the Revised Code. (D)(F) The jurisdiction acquired by a probate court over a matter or proceeding is exclusive of that of any other probate court, except when otherwise provided by law. Sec. 2108.90. Pursuant to division (A)(B) of section 2101.24 of the Revised Code, the probate court for the county in which the declarant or deceased person resided at the time of death or the county in which a living person whose post-death arrangements are the subject of dispute resides shall have exclusive jurisdiction over any action that results from sections 2108.70 to 2108.89 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2945.38. (A) If the issue of a defendant's competence to stand trial is raised and if the court, upon conducting the hearing provided for in section 2945.37 of the Revised Code, finds that the defendant is competent to stand trial, the defendant shall be proceeded against as provided by law. If the court finds the defendant competent to stand trial and the defendant is receiving psychotropic drugs or other medication, the court may authorize the continued administration of the drugs or medication or other appropriate treatment in order to maintain the defendant's competence to stand trial, unless the defendant's attending physician advises the court against continuation of the drugs, other medication, or treatment. (B)(1)(a)(i) If the defendant has been charged with a felony offense or a misdemeanor offense of violence for which the prosecutor has not recommended the procedures under division (B)(1)(a)(vi) of this section and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial and that there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within one year if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, the court shall order the defendant to undergo treatment. (ii) If the defendant has been charged with a felony offense and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, but the court is unable at that time to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within one year if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, the court shall order continuing evaluation and treatment of the defendant for a period not to exceed four months to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within one year if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment. (iii) If the defendant has not been charged with a felony offense but has been charged with a misdemeanor offense of violence and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, but the court is unable at that time to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within the time frame permitted under division (C)(1) of this section, the court may order continuing evaluation and treatment of the defendant for a period not to exceed the maximum period permitted under that division. (iv) If the defendant has not been charged with a felony offense or a misdemeanor offense of violence, but has been charged with a misdemeanor offense that is not a misdemeanor offense of violence and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, but the court is unable at that time to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within the time frame permitted under division (C)(1) of this section, the court shall dismiss the charges and follow the process outlined in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of this section. (v) If the defendant has not been charged with a felony offense or a misdemeanor offense of violence, or if the defendant has been charged with a misdemeanor offense of violence and the prosecutor has recommended the procedures under division (B)(1)(a)(vi) of this section, and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the trial court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, the trial court shall do one of the following: (I) Dismiss the charges pending against the defendant. A dismissal under this division is not a bar to further prosecution based on the same conduct. Upon dismissal of the charges, the trial court shall discharge the defendant unless the court or prosecutor, after consideration of the requirements of section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, files an affidavit in probate court or trial court alleging that the defendant is a mentally ill person subject to court order or after consideration of the requirements of section 5123.71 of the Revised Code, files an affidavit in the probate court or trial court alleging that the defendant is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. If an affidavit is filed in probate court or trial court, the trial court may detain the defendant for ten days pending a hearing in the probate court and or trial court. If an affidavit is filed in the probate court, the trial court shall send to the probate court copies of all written reports of the defendant's mental condition that were prepared pursuant to section 2945.371 of the Revised Code. The trial court or prosecutor shall specify in the appropriate space on the affidavit that the defendant is a person described in this subdivision. (II) Order the defendant to undergo outpatient competency restoration treatment at a facility operated or certified by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health as being qualified to treat mental illness, at a public or community mental health facility, at a jail that employs or contracts with an individual or entity listed in division (B)(1)(b)(i) of this section to provide treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment at a jail, or in the care of a psychiatrist or other mental health professional. If a defendant who has been released on bail or recognizance refuses to comply with court-ordered outpatient treatment under this division, the court may dismiss the charges pending against the defendant and proceed under division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of this section or may amend the conditions of bail or recognizance and order the sheriff to take the defendant into custody and deliver the defendant to a center or facility operated or certified by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health for treatment. (vi) If the defendant has not been charged with a felony offense but has been charged with a misdemeanor offense of violence and after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, the prosecutor in the case may recommend that the court follow the procedures prescribed in division (B)(1)(a)(v) of this section. If the prosecutor does not make such a recommendation, the court shall follow the procedures in division (B)(1)(a)(i) of this section. (b)(i) The court order for the defendant to undergo treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall specify that the defendant, if determined to require mental health treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment, shall be committed to one of the following: (I) The department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health for treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment at a hospital, facility, or agency, as determined to be clinically appropriate by the department; (II) A facility certified by the department of mental health and addiction behavioral health services as being qualified to treat mental illness; (III) A public or community mental health facility; (IV) A jail that employs or contracts with an entity or individual listed in division (B)(1)(b)(i) of this section to provide treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment at a jail; (V) A psychiatrist or another mental health professional for treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment. (ii) Prior to placing the defendant, the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health shall obtain court approval for that placement following a hearing. The court order for the defendant to undergo treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall specify that the defendant, if determined to require treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment for an intellectual disability, shall receive treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment at an institution or facility operated by the department of developmental disabilities, at a facility certified by the department of developmental disabilities as being qualified to treat intellectual disabilities, at a public or private intellectual disabilities facility, or by a psychiatrist or another intellectual disabilities professional. In any case, the order may restrict the defendant's freedom of movement as the court considers necessary. The prosecutor in the defendant's case shall send to the chief clinical officer of the hospital, facility, or agency where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction servicesbehavioral heath, or to the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail, or the person to which the defendant is committed, copies of relevant police reports and other background information that pertains to the defendant and is available to the prosecutor unless the prosecutor determines that the release of any of the information in the police reports or any of the other background information to unauthorized persons would interfere with the effective prosecution of any person or would create a substantial risk of harm to any person. (iii) In determining the place of commitment, the court shall consider the extent to which the person is a danger to the person and to others, the need for security, the availability of housing and supportive services, including outpatient mental health services in the community, and the type of crime involved and shall order the least restrictive alternative available that is consistent with public safety and treatment goals. In weighing these factors, the court shall give preference to protecting public safety and the availability of housing and supportive services. (c) If the defendant is found incompetent to stand trial, if the chief clinical officer of the hospital, facility, or agency where the defendant is placed, or the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail, or the person to which the defendant is committed for treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment under division (B)(1)(b) of this section determines that medication is necessary to restore the defendant's competency to stand trial, and if the defendant lacks the capacity to give informed consent or refuses medication, the chief clinical officer of the hospital, facility, or agency where the defendant is placed, or the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail, or the person to which the defendant is committed for treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment may petition the court for authorization for the involuntary administration of medication. The court shall hold a hearing on the petition within five days of the filing of the petition if the petition was filed in a municipal court or a county court regarding an incompetent defendant charged with a misdemeanor or within ten days of the filing of the petition if the petition was filed in a court of common pleas regarding an incompetent defendant charged with a felony offense. Following the hearing, the court may authorize the involuntary administration of medication or may dismiss the petition. (2) If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial and that, even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within one year, the court shall order the discharge of the defendant, unless upon motion of the prosecutor or on its own motion, the court either seeks to retain jurisdiction over the defendant pursuant to section 2945.39 of the Revised Code or files an affidavit in the probate court or trial court for the civil commitment of the defendant pursuant to Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code alleging that the defendant is a person with a mental illness subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. If an affidavit is filed in the probate court, the trial court shall send to the probate court copies of all written reports of the defendant's mental condition that were prepared pursuant to section 2945.371 of the Revised Code. The trial court may issue the temporary order of detention that a probate court may issue under section 5122.11 or 5123.71 of the Revised Code, to remain in effect until the probable cause or initial hearing in the probate court. Further proceedings in the probate court are civil proceedings governed by Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code. (C) No defendant shall be required to undergo treatment, including any continuing evaluation and treatment, under division (B)(1) of this section for longer than whichever of the following periods is applicable: (1) One year, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is one of the following offenses: (a) Aggravated murder, murder, or an offense of violence for which a sentence of death or life imprisonment may be imposed; (b) An offense of violence that is a felony of the first or second degree; (c) A conspiracy to commit, an attempt to commit, or complicity in the commission of an offense described in division (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section if the conspiracy, attempt, or complicity is a felony of the first or second degree. (2) Six months, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is a felony other than a felony described in division (C)(1) of this section; (3) Sixty days, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is a misdemeanor of the first or second degree; (4) Thirty days, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is a misdemeanor of the third or fourth degree, a minor misdemeanor, or an unclassified misdemeanor. (D) Any defendant who is committed pursuant to this section shall not voluntarily admit the defendant or be voluntarily admitted to a hospital or institution pursuant to section 5122.02, 5122.15, 5123.69, or 5123.76 of the Revised Code. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a defendant who is charged with an offense and is committed by the court under this section to the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or is committed to an institution or facility for the treatment of intellectual disabilities shall not be granted unsupervised on-grounds movement, supervised off-grounds movement, or nonsecured status except in accordance with the court order. The court may grant a defendant supervised off-grounds movement to obtain medical treatment or specialized habilitation treatment services if the person who supervises the treatment or the continuing evaluation and treatment of the defendant ordered under division (B)(1)(a) of this section informs the court that the treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment cannot be provided at the hospital or facility where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or the institution, facility, or jail to which the defendant is committed. The chief clinical officer of the hospital or facility where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail to which the defendant is committed, or a designee of any of those persons, may grant a defendant movement to a medical facility for an emergency medical situation with appropriate supervision to ensure the safety of the defendant, staff, and community during that emergency medical situation. The chief clinical officer of the hospital or facility where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail to which the defendant is committed shall notify the court within twenty-four hours of the defendant's movement to the medical facility for an emergency medical situation under this division. (F) The person who supervises the treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment of a defendant ordered to undergo treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall file a written report with the court at the following times: (1) Whenever the person believes the defendant is capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense; (2) For a felony offense, fourteen days before expiration of the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of this section and fourteen days before the expiration of the maximum time for continuing evaluation and treatment as specified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, and, for a misdemeanor offense, ten days before the expiration of the maximum time for treatment, as specified in division (C) of this section; (3) At a minimum, after each six months of treatment; (4) Whenever the person who supervises the treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment of a defendant ordered under division (B)(1)(a) of this section believes that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant or of assisting in the defendant's defense even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment. (G) A report under division (F) of this section shall contain the examiner's findings, the facts in reasonable detail on which the findings are based, and the examiner's opinion as to the defendant's capability of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense. If, in the examiner's opinion, the defendant remains incapable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense and there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, if in the examiner's opinion the defendant continues to have a mental illness or an intellectual disability, and if the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of this section has not expired, the report also shall contain the examiner's recommendation as to the least restrictive placement or commitment alternative that is consistent with the defendant's treatment needs for restoration to competency and with the safety of the community. The court shall provide copies of the report to the prosecutor and defense counsel. (H) If a defendant is committed pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, within ten days after the treating physician of the defendant or the examiner of the defendant who is employed or retained by the treating facility advises that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant or of assisting in the defendant's defense even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, within ten days after the expiration of the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of this section, within ten days after the expiration of the maximum time for continuing evaluation and treatment as specified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, within thirty days after a defendant's request for a hearing that is made after six months of treatment, or within thirty days after being advised by the treating physician or examiner that the defendant is competent to stand trial, whichever is the earliest, the court shall conduct another hearing to determine if the defendant is competent to stand trial and shall do whichever of the following is applicable: (1) If the court finds that the defendant is competent to stand trial, the defendant shall be proceeded against as provided by law. (2) If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, but that there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, and the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of this section has not expired, the court, after consideration of the examiner's recommendation, shall order that treatment be continued, may change the facility or location at which the treatment is to be continued, and shall specify whether the treatment is to be continued at the same or a different facility or location. (3) If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, if the defendant is charged with an offense listed in division (C)(1) of this section, and if the court finds that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, or if the maximum time for treatment relative to that offense as specified in division (C) of this section has expired, further proceedings shall be as provided in sections 2945.39, 2945.401, and 2945.402 of the Revised Code. (4) If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is a misdemeanor or a felony other than a felony listed in division (C)(1) of this section, and if the court finds that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, or if the maximum time for treatment relative to that offense as specified in division (C) of this section has expired, the court shall dismiss the indictment, information, or complaint against the defendant. A dismissal under this division is not a bar to further prosecution based on the same conduct. The court shall discharge the defendant unless the court or prosecutor files an affidavit in probate court or with the trial court for civil commitment pursuant to Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code. If an affidavit for civil commitment is filed, the court may detain the defendant for ten days pending civil commitment and . If an affidavit is filed in the probate court, the trial court shall send to the probate court copies of all written reports of the defendant's mental condition prepared pursuant to section 2945.371 of the Revised Code. All of the following provisions apply to persons charged with a misdemeanor or a felony other than a felony listed in division (C)(1) of this section who are committed by the probate court subsequent to the court's or prosecutor's filing of an affidavit for civil commitment under authority of this division: (a) The chief clinical officer of the entity, hospital, or facility, the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail, or the person to which the defendant is committed or admitted shall do all of the following: (i) Notify the prosecutor, in writing, of the discharge of the defendant, send the notice at least ten days prior to the discharge unless the discharge is by the probate court, and state in the notice the date on which the defendant will be discharged; (ii) Notify the prosecutor, in writing, when the defendant is absent without leave or is granted unsupervised, off-grounds movement, and send this notice promptly after the discovery of the absence without leave or prior to the granting of the unsupervised, off-grounds movement, whichever is applicable; (iii) Notify the prosecutor, in writing, of the change of the defendant's commitment or admission to voluntary status, send the notice promptly upon learning of the change to voluntary status, and state in the notice the date on which the defendant was committed or admitted on a voluntary status. (b) Upon receiving notice that the defendant will be granted unsupervised, off-grounds movement, the prosecutor either shall re-indict the defendant or promptly notify the court that the prosecutor does not intend to prosecute the charges against the defendant. (I) If a defendant is convicted of a crime and sentenced to a jail, the defendant's sentence shall be reduced by the total number of days the defendant is confined for evaluation to determine the defendant's competence to stand trial or treatment under this section and sections 2945.37 and 2945.371 of the Revised Code or by the total number of days the defendant is confined for evaluation to determine the defendant's mental condition at the time of the offense charged. Sec. 2945.39. (A) If a defendant who is charged with an offense described in division (C)(1) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code is found incompetent to stand trial, after the expiration of the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of that section or after the court finds that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, one of the following applies: (1) The court or the prosecutor may file an affidavit in probate court or with the trial court for civil commitment of the defendant in the manner provided in Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code. If the court or prosecutor files an affidavit for civil commitment, the court may detain the defendant for ten days pending civil commitment. If the probate court or trial court commits the defendant subsequent to the court's or prosecutor's filing of an affidavit for civil commitment, the chief clinical officer of the entity, hospital, or facility, the managing officer of the institution, the director of the program, or the person to which the defendant is committed or admitted shall send to the prosecutor the notices described in divisions (H)(4)(a)(i) to (iii) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code within the periods of time and under the circumstances specified in those divisions. (2) On the motion of the prosecutor or on its own motion, the court may retain jurisdiction over the defendant if, at a hearing, the court finds both of the following by clear and convincing evidence: (a) The defendant committed the offense with which the defendant is charged. (b) The defendant is a person with a mental illness subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. (B) In making its determination under division (A)(2) of this section as to whether to retain jurisdiction over the defendant, the court may consider all relevant evidence, including, but not limited to, any relevant psychiatric, psychological, or medical testimony or reports, the acts constituting the offense charged, and any history of the defendant that is relevant to the defendant's ability to conform to the law. (C) If the court conducts a hearing as described in division (A)(2) of this section and if the court does not make both findings described in divisions (A)(2)(a) and (b) of this section by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall dismiss the indictment, information, or complaint against the defendant. Upon the dismissal, the court shall discharge the defendant unless the court or prosecutor files an affidavit in probate court or with the trial court for civil commitment of the defendant pursuant to Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code. If the court or prosecutor files an affidavit for civil commitment, the court may order that the defendant be detained for up to ten days pending the civil commitment. If the probate court or trial court commits the defendant subsequent to the court's or prosecutor's filing of an affidavit for civil commitment, the chief clinical officer of the entity, hospital, or facility, the managing officer of the institution, the director of the program, or the person to which the defendant is committed or admitted shall send to the prosecutor the notices described in divisions (H)(4)(a)(i) to (iii) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code within the periods of time and under the circumstances specified in those divisions. A dismissal of charges under this division is not a bar to further criminal proceedings based on the same conduct. (D)(1) If the court conducts a hearing as described in division (A)(2) of this section and if the court makes the findings described in divisions (A)(2)(a) and (b) of this section by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall commit the defendant, if determined to require mental health treatment, either to the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health for treatment at a hospital, facility, or agency as determined clinically appropriate by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or to another medical or psychiatric facility, as appropriate. Prior to placing the defendant, the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health shall obtain court approval for that placement. If the court conducts such a hearing and if it makes those findings by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall commit the defendant, if determined to require treatment for an intellectual disability, to a facility operated by the department of developmental disabilities, or another facility, as appropriate. In determining the place of commitment, the court shall consider the extent to which the person is a danger to the person and to others, the need for security, and the type of crime involved and shall order the least restrictive alternative available that is consistent with public safety and the welfare of the defendant. In weighing these factors, the court shall give preference to protecting public safety. (2) If a court makes a commitment of a defendant under division (D)(1) of this section, the prosecutor shall send to the hospital, facility, or agency where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or to the defendant's place of commitment all reports of the defendant's current mental condition and, except as otherwise provided in this division, any other relevant information, including, but not limited to, a transcript of the hearing held pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section, copies of relevant police reports, and copies of any prior arrest and conviction records that pertain to the defendant and that the prosecutor possesses. The prosecutor shall send the reports of the defendant's current mental condition in every case of commitment, and, unless the prosecutor determines that the release of any of the other relevant information to unauthorized persons would interfere with the effective prosecution of any person or would create a substantial risk of harm to any person, the prosecutor also shall send the other relevant information. Upon admission of a defendant committed under division (D)(1) of this section, the place of commitment shall send to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or the community mental health board serving the county in which the charges against the defendant were filed a copy of all reports of the defendant's current mental condition and a copy of the other relevant information provided by the prosecutor under this division, including, if provided, a transcript of the hearing held pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section, the relevant police reports, and the prior arrest and conviction records that pertain to the defendant and that the prosecutor possesses. (3) If a court makes a commitment under division (D)(1) of this section, all further proceedings shall be in accordance with sections 2945.401 and 2945.402 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2945.401. (A) A defendant found incompetent to stand trial and committed pursuant to section 2945.39 of the Revised Code or a person found not guilty by reason of insanity and committed pursuant to section 2945.40 of the Revised Code shall remain subject to the jurisdiction of the trial court pursuant to that commitment, and to the provisions of this section, until the final termination of the commitment as described in division (J)(1) of this section. If the jurisdiction is terminated under this division because of the final termination of the commitment resulting from the expiration of the maximum prison term or term of imprisonment described in division (J)(1)(b) of this section, the court or prosecutor may file an affidavit for the civil commitment of the defendant or person pursuant to Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code. (B) A hearing conducted under any provision of sections 2945.37 to 2945.402 of the Revised Code shall not be conducted in accordance with Chapters 5122. and 5123. of the Revised Code. Any person who is committed pursuant to section 2945.39 or 2945.40 of the Revised Code shall not voluntarily admit the person or be voluntarily admitted to a hospital or institution pursuant to section 5122.02, 5122.15, 5123.69, or 5123.76 of the Revised Code. All other provisions of Chapters 5122. and 5123. of the Revised Code regarding hospitalization or institutionalization shall apply to the extent they are not in conflict with this chapter. A commitment under section 2945.39 or 2945.40 of the Revised Code shall not be terminated and the conditions of the commitment shall not be changed except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) of this section with respect to a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order or except by order of the trial court. (C) The department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or the institution, facility, or program to which a defendant or person has been committed under section 2945.39 or 2945.40 of the Revised Code shall report in writing to the trial court, at the times specified in this division, as to whether the defendant or person remains a person with a mental illness subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order and, in the case of a defendant committed under section 2945.39 of the Revised Code, as to whether the defendant remains incompetent to stand trial. The department, institution, facility, or program shall make the reports after the initial six months of treatment and every two years after the initial report is made. The trial court shall provide copies of the reports to the prosecutor and to the counsel for the defendant or person. Within thirty days after its receipt pursuant to this division of a report from the department, institution, facility, or program, the trial court shall hold a hearing on the continued commitment of the defendant or person or on any changes in the conditions of the commitment of the defendant or person. The defendant or person may request a change in the conditions of confinement, and the trial court shall conduct a hearing on that request if six months or more have elapsed since the most recent hearing was conducted under this section. (D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) of this section, when a defendant or person has been committed under section 2945.39 or 2945.40 of the Revised Code, at any time after evaluating the risks to public safety and the welfare of the defendant or person, the designee of the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or the managing officer of the institution or director of the facility or program to which the defendant or person is committed may recommend a termination of the defendant's or person's commitment or a change in the conditions of the defendant's or person's commitment. Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) of this section, if the designee of the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health recommends on-grounds unsupervised movement, off-grounds supervised movement, or nonsecured status for the defendant or person or termination of the defendant's or person's commitment, the following provisions apply: (a) If the department's designee recommends on-grounds unsupervised movement or off-grounds supervised movement, the department's designee shall file with the trial court an application for approval of the movement and shall send a copy of the application to the prosecutor. Within fifteen days after receiving the application, the prosecutor may request a hearing on the application and, if a hearing is requested, shall so inform the department's designee. If the prosecutor does not request a hearing within the fifteen-day period, the trial court shall approve the application by entering its order approving the requested movement or, within five days after the expiration of the fifteen-day period, shall set a date for a hearing on the application. If the prosecutor requests a hearing on the application within the fifteen-day period, the trial court shall hold a hearing on the application within thirty days after the hearing is requested. If the trial court, within five days after the expiration of the fifteen-day period, sets a date for a hearing on the application, the trial court shall hold the hearing within thirty days after setting the hearing date. At least fifteen days before any hearing is held under this division, the trial court shall give the prosecutor written notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing. At the conclusion of each hearing conducted under this division, the trial court either shall approve or disapprove the application and shall enter its order accordingly. (b) If the department's designee recommends termination of the defendant's or person's commitment at any time or if the department's designee recommends the first of any nonsecured status for the defendant or person, the department's designee shall send written notice of this recommendation to the trial court and to the local forensic center. The local forensic center shall evaluate the committed defendant or person and, within thirty days after its receipt of the written notice, shall submit to the trial court and the department's designee a written report of the evaluation. The trial court shall provide a copy of the department's designee's written notice and of the local forensic center's written report to the prosecutor and to the counsel for the defendant or person. Upon the local forensic center's submission of the report to the trial court and the department's designee, all of the following apply: (i) If the forensic center disagrees with the recommendation of the department's designee, it shall inform the department's designee and the trial court of its decision and the reasons for the decision. The department's designee, after consideration of the forensic center's decision, shall either withdraw, proceed with, or modify and proceed with the recommendation. If the department's designee proceeds with, or modifies and proceeds with, the recommendation, the department's designee shall proceed in accordance with division (D)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. (ii) If the forensic center agrees with the recommendation of the department's designee, it shall inform the department's designee and the trial court of its decision and the reasons for the decision, and the department's designee shall proceed in accordance with division (D)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. (iii) If the forensic center disagrees with the recommendation of the department's designee and the department's designee proceeds with, or modifies and proceeds with, the recommendation or if the forensic center agrees with the recommendation of the department's designee, the department's designee shall work with community mental health services providers, programs, facilities, or boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or community mental health boards to develop a plan to implement the recommendation. If the defendant or person is on medication, the plan shall include, but shall not be limited to, a system to monitor the defendant's or person's compliance with the prescribed medication treatment plan. The system shall include a schedule that clearly states when the defendant or person shall report for a medication compliance check. The medication compliance checks shall be based upon the effective duration of the prescribed medication, taking into account the route by which it is taken, and shall be scheduled at intervals sufficiently close together to detect a potential increase in mental illness symptoms that the medication is intended to prevent. The department's designee, after consultation with the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or the community mental health board serving the area, shall send the recommendation and plan developed under division (D)(1)(b)(iii) of this section, in writing, to the trial court, the prosecutor, and the counsel for the committed defendant or person. The trial court shall conduct a hearing on the recommendation and plan developed under division (D)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. Divisions (D)(1)(c) and (d) and (E) to (J) of this section apply regarding the hearing. (c) If the department's designee's recommendation is for nonsecured status or termination of commitment, the prosecutor may obtain an independent expert evaluation of the defendant's or person's mental condition, and the trial court may continue the hearing on the recommendation for a period of not more than thirty days to permit time for the evaluation. The prosecutor may introduce the evaluation report or present other evidence at the hearing in accordance with the Rules of Evidence. (d) The trial court shall schedule the hearing on a department's designee's recommendation for nonsecured status or termination of commitment and shall give reasonable notice to the prosecutor and the counsel for the defendant or person. Unless continued for independent evaluation at the prosecutor's request or for other good cause, the hearing shall be held within thirty days after the trial court's receipt of the recommendation and plan. (2)(a) Division (D)(1) of this section does not apply to on-grounds unsupervised movement of a defendant or person who has been committed under section 2945.39 or 2945.40 of the Revised Code, who is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, and who is being provided residential habilitation, care, and treatment in a facility operated by the department of developmental disabilities. (b) If, pursuant to section 2945.39 of the Revised Code, the trial court commits a defendant who is found incompetent to stand trial and who is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, if the defendant is being provided residential habilitation, care, and treatment in a facility operated by the department of developmental disabilities, if an individual who is conducting a survey for the department of health to determine the facility's compliance with the certification requirements of the medicaid program cites the defendant's receipt of the residential habilitation, care, and treatment in the facility as being inappropriate under the certification requirements, if the defendant's receipt of the residential habilitation, care, and treatment in the facility potentially jeopardizes the facility's continued receipt of federal medicaid moneys, and if as a result of the citation the chief clinical officer of the facility determines that the conditions of the defendant's commitment should be changed, the department of developmental disabilities may cause the defendant to be removed from the particular facility and, after evaluating the risks to public safety and the welfare of the defendant and after determining whether another type of placement is consistent with the certification requirements, may place the defendant in another facility that the department selects as an appropriate facility for the defendant's continued receipt of residential habilitation, care, and treatment and that is a no less secure setting than the facility in which the defendant had been placed at the time of the citation. Within three days after the defendant's removal and alternative placement under the circumstances described in division (D)(2)(b) of this section, the department of developmental disabilities shall notify the trial court and the prosecutor in writing of the removal and alternative placement. The trial court shall set a date for a hearing on the removal and alternative placement, and the hearing shall be held within twenty-one days after the trial court's receipt of the notice from the department of developmental disabilities. At least ten days before the hearing is held, the trial court shall give the prosecutor, the department of developmental disabilities, and the counsel for the defendant written notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing. At the hearing, the trial court shall consider the citation issued by the individual who conducted the survey for the department of health to be prima-facie evidence of the fact that the defendant's commitment to the particular facility was inappropriate under the certification requirements of the medicaid program and potentially jeopardizes the particular facility's continued receipt of federal medicaid moneys. At the conclusion of the hearing, the trial court may approve or disapprove the defendant's removal and alternative placement. If the trial court approves the defendant's removal and alternative placement, the department of developmental disabilities may continue the defendant's alternative placement. If the trial court disapproves the defendant's removal and alternative placement, it shall enter an order modifying the defendant's removal and alternative placement, but that order shall not require the department of developmental disabilities to replace the defendant for purposes of continued residential habilitation, care, and treatment in the facility associated with the citation issued by the individual who conducted the survey for the department of health. (E) In making a determination under this section regarding nonsecured status or termination of commitment, the trial court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (1) Whether, in the trial court's view, the defendant or person currently represents a substantial risk of physical harm to the defendant or person or others; (2) Psychiatric and medical testimony as to the current mental and physical condition of the defendant or person; (3) Whether the defendant or person has insight into the defendant's or person's condition so that the defendant or person will continue treatment as prescribed or seek professional assistance as needed; (4) The grounds upon which the state relies for the proposed commitment; (5) Any past history that is relevant to establish the defendant's or person's degree of conformity to the laws, rules, regulations, and values of society; (6) If there is evidence that the defendant's or person's mental illness is in a state of remission, the medically suggested cause and degree of the remission and the probability that the defendant or person will continue treatment to maintain the remissive state of the defendant's or person's illness should the defendant's or person's commitment conditions be altered. (F) At any hearing held pursuant to division (C) or (D)(1) or (2) of this section, the defendant or the person shall have all the rights of a defendant or person at a commitment hearing as described in section 2945.40 of the Revised Code. (G) In a hearing held pursuant to division (C) or (D)(1) of this section, the prosecutor has the burden of proof as follows: (1) For a recommendation of termination of commitment, to show by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant or person remains a person with a mental illness subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order; (2) For a recommendation for a change in the conditions of the commitment to a less restrictive status, to show by clear and convincing evidence that the proposed change represents a threat to public safety or a threat to the safety of any person. (H) In a hearing held pursuant to division (C) or (D)(1) or (2) of this section, the prosecutor shall represent the state or the public interest. (I) At the conclusion of a hearing conducted under division (D)(1) of this section regarding a recommendation from the designee of the department of mental health and addiction servicesbehavioral health, managing officer of the institution, or director of a facility or program, the trial court may approve, disapprove, or modify the recommendation and shall enter an order accordingly. (J)(1) A defendant or person who has been committed pursuant to section 2945.39 or 2945.40 of the Revised Code continues to be under the jurisdiction of the trial court until the final termination of the commitment. For purposes of division (J) of this section, the final termination of a commitment occurs upon the earlier of one of the following: (a) The defendant or person no longer is a person with a mental illness subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, as determined by the trial court; (b) The expiration of the maximum prison term or term of imprisonment that the defendant or person could have received if the defendant or person had been convicted of the most serious offense with which the defendant or person is charged or in relation to which the defendant or person was found not guilty by reason of insanity; (c) The trial court enters an order terminating the commitment under the circumstances described in division (J)(2)(a)(ii) of this section. (2)(a) If a defendant is found incompetent to stand trial and committed pursuant to section 2945.39 of the Revised Code, if neither of the circumstances described in divisions (J)(1)(a) and (b) of this section applies to that defendant, and if a report filed with the trial court pursuant to division (C) of this section indicates that the defendant presently is competent to stand trial or if, at any other time during the period of the defendant's commitment, the prosecutor, the counsel for the defendant, or the designee of the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or the managing officer of the institution or director of the facility or program to which the defendant is committed files an application with the trial court alleging that the defendant presently is competent to stand trial and requesting a hearing on the competency issue or the trial court otherwise has reasonable cause to believe that the defendant presently is competent to stand trial and determines on its own motion to hold a hearing on the competency issue, the trial court shall schedule a hearing on the competency of the defendant to stand trial, shall give the prosecutor, the counsel for the defendant, and the department's designee or the managing officer of the institution or the director of the facility to which the defendant is committed notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing at least fifteen days before the hearing, and shall conduct the hearing within thirty days of the filing of the application or of its own motion. If, at the conclusion of the hearing, the trial court determines that the defendant presently is capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense, the trial court shall order that the defendant is competent to stand trial and shall be proceeded against as provided by law with respect to the applicable offenses described in division (C)(1) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code and shall enter whichever of the following additional orders is appropriate: (i) If the trial court determines that the defendant remains a person with a mental illness subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, the trial court shall order that the defendant's commitment to the department of mental health and addiction services or to an institution, facility, or program for the treatment of intellectual disabilities be continued during the pendency of the trial on the applicable offenses described in division (C)(1) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code. (ii) If the trial court determines that the defendant no longer is a person with a mental illness subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, the trial court shall order that the defendant's commitment to the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or to an institution, facility, or program for the treatment of intellectual disabilities shall not be continued during the pendency of the trial on the applicable offenses described in division (C)(1) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code. This order shall be a final termination of the commitment for purposes of division (J)(1)(c) of this section. (b) If, at the conclusion of the hearing described in division (J)(2)(a) of this section, the trial court determines that the defendant remains incapable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant or of assisting in the defendant's defense, the trial court shall order that the defendant continues to be incompetent to stand trial, that the defendant's commitment to the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or to an institution, facility, or program for the treatment of intellectual disabilities shall be continued, and that the defendant remains subject to the jurisdiction of the trial court pursuant to that commitment, and to the provisions of this section, until the final termination of the commitment as described in division (J)(1) of this section. Sec. 5122.01. As used in this chapter and Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code: (A) "Mental illness" means a substantial disorder of thought, mood, perception, orientation, or memory that grossly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to meet the ordinary demands of life. (B) "Person with a mental illness subject to court order" means a person with a mental illness who, because of the person's illness: (1) Represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self as manifested by evidence of threats of, or attempts at, suicide or serious self-inflicted bodily harm; (2) Represents a substantial risk of physical harm to others as manifested by evidence of recent homicidal or other violent behavior, evidence of recent threats that place another in reasonable fear of violent behavior and serious physical harm, or other evidence of present dangerousness; (3) Represents a substantial and immediate risk of serious physical impairment or injury to self as manifested by evidence that the person is unable to provide for and is not providing for the person's basic physical needs because of the person's mental illness and that appropriate provision for those needs cannot be made immediately available in the community; (4) Would benefit from treatment for the person's mental illness and is in need of such treatment as manifested by evidence of behavior that creates a grave and imminent risk to substantial rights of others or the person; (5)(a) Would benefit from treatment as manifested by evidence of behavior that indicates all of the following: (i) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision, based on a clinical determination. (ii) The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for mental illness and one of the following applies: (I) At least twice within the thirty-six months prior to the filing of an affidavit seeking court-ordered treatment of the person under section 5122.111 of the Revised Code, the lack of compliance has been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization in a hospital or receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a correctional facility, provided that the thirty-six-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the thirty-six-month period. (II) Within the forty-eight months prior to the filing of an affidavit seeking court-ordered treatment of the person under section 5122.111 of the Revised Code, the lack of compliance resulted in one or more acts of serious violent behavior toward self or others or threats of, or attempts at, serious physical harm to self or others, provided that the forty-eight-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the forty-eight-month period. (iii) The person, as a result of the person's mental illness, is unlikely to voluntarily participate in necessary treatment. (iv) In view of the person's treatment history and current behavior, the person is in need of treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in substantial risk of serious harm to the person or others. (b) An individual who meets only the criteria described in division (B)(5)(a) of this section is not subject to hospitalization. (C)(1) "Patient" means, subject to division (C)(2) of this section, a person who is admitted either voluntarily or involuntarily to a hospital or other place under section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code subsequent to a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetence to stand trial or under this chapter, who is under observation or receiving treatment in such place. (2) "Patient" does not include a person admitted to a hospital or other place under section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code to the extent that the reference in this chapter to patient, or the context in which the reference occurs, is in conflict with any provision of sections 2945.37 to 2945.402 of the Revised Code. (D) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed under the laws of this state to practice medicine or a medical officer of the government of the United States while in this state in the performance of the person's official duties. (E) "Psychiatrist" means a licensed physician who has satisfactorily completed a residency training program in psychiatry, as approved by the residency review committee of the American medical association, the committee on post-graduate education of the American osteopathic association, or the American osteopathic board of neurology and psychiatry, or who on July 1, 1989, has been recognized as a psychiatrist by the Ohio state medical association or the Ohio osteopathic association on the basis of formal training and five or more years of medical practice limited to psychiatry. (F) "Hospital" means a hospital or inpatient unit licensed by the department of behavioral health under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, and any institution, hospital, or other place established, controlled, or supervised by the department under Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code. (G) "Public hospital" means a facility that is tax-supported and under the jurisdiction of the department of behavioral health. (H) "Community mental health services provider" means an agency, association, corporation, individual, or program that provides community mental health services that are certified by the director of behavioral health under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code. (I) "Licensed clinical psychologist" means a person who holds a current, valid psychologist license issued under section 4732.12 of the Revised Code, and in addition, meets the educational requirements set forth in division (B) of section 4732.10 of the Revised Code and has a minimum of two years' full-time professional experience, or the equivalent as determined by rule of the state board of psychology, at least one year of which shall be a predoctoral internship, in clinical psychological work in a public or private hospital or clinic or in private practice, diagnosing and treating problems of mental illness or intellectual disability under the supervision of a psychologist who is licensed or who holds a diploma issued by the American board of professional psychology, or whose qualifications are substantially similar to those required for licensure by the state board of psychology when the supervision has occurred prior to enactment of laws governing the practice of psychology. (J) "Health officer" means any public health physician; public health nurse; or other person authorized or designated by a city or general health district or a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to perform the duties of a health officer under this chapter. (K) "Chief clinical officer" means the medical director of a hospital, community mental health services provider, or board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, or, if there is no medical director, the licensed physician responsible for the treatment provided by a hospital or community mental health services provider. The chief clinical officer may delegate to the attending physician responsible for a patient's care the duties imposed on the chief clinical officer by this chapter. In the case of a community mental health services provider, the chief clinical officer shall be designated by the governing body of the services provider and shall be a licensed physician or licensed clinical psychologist who supervises diagnostic and treatment services. A licensed physician or licensed clinical psychologist designated by the chief clinical officer may perform the duties and accept the responsibilities of the chief clinical officer in the chief clinical officer's absence. (L) "Working day" or "court day" means Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, and Friday, except when such day is a holiday. (M) "Indigent" means unable without deprivation of satisfaction of basic needs to provide for the payment of an attorney and other necessary expenses of legal representation, including expert testimony. (N) "Respondent" means the person whose detention, commitment, hospitalization, continued hospitalization or commitment, or discharge is being sought in any proceeding under this chapter. (O) "Ohio protection and advocacy system" has the same meaning as in section 5123.60 of the Revised Code. (P) "Independent expert evaluation" means an evaluation conducted by a licensed clinical psychologist, psychiatrist, or licensed physician who has been selected by the respondent or the respondent's counsel and who consents to conducting the evaluation. (Q) "Court""Probate court" means the probate division of the court of common pleas. (R) "Expunge" means: (1) The removal and destruction of court files and records, originals and copies, and the deletion of all index references; (2) The reporting to the person of the nature and extent of any information about the person transmitted to any other person by the court; (3) Otherwise insuring that any examination of court files and records in question shall show no record whatever with respect to the person; (4) That all rights and privileges are restored, and that the person, the court, and any other person may properly reply that no such record exists, as to any matter expunged. (S) "Residence" means a person's physical presence in a county with intent to remain there, except that: (1) If a person is receiving a mental health service at a facility that includes nighttime sleeping accommodations, residence means that county in which the person maintained the person's primary place of residence at the time the person entered the facility; (2) If a person is committed pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code, residence means the county where the criminal charges were filed. When the residence of a person is disputed, the matter of residence shall be referred to the department of behavioral health for investigation and determination. Residence shall not be a basis for a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to deny services to any person present in the board's service district, and the board shall provide services for a person whose residence is in dispute while residence is being determined and for a person in an emergency situation. (T) "Admission" to a hospital or other place means that a patient is accepted for and stays at least one night at the hospital or other place. (U) "Prosecutor" means the prosecuting attorney, village solicitor, city director of law, or similar chief legal officer who prosecuted a criminal case in which a person was found not guilty by reason of insanity, who would have had the authority to prosecute a criminal case against a person if the person had not been found incompetent to stand trial, or who prosecuted a case in which a person was found guilty. (V)(1) "Treatment plan" means a written statement of reasonable objectives and goals for an individual established by the treatment team, with specific criteria to evaluate progress towards achieving those objectives. (2) The active participation of the patient in establishing the objectives and goals shall be documented. The treatment plan shall be based on patient needs and include services to be provided to the patient while the patient is hospitalized, after the patient is discharged, or in an outpatient setting. The treatment plan shall address services to be provided. In the establishment of the treatment plan, consideration should be given to the availability of services, which may include but are not limited to all of the following: (a) Community psychiatric supportive treatment; (b) Assertive community treatment; (c) Medications; (d) Individual or group therapy; (e) Peer support services; (f) Financial services; (g) Housing or supervised living services; (h) Alcohol or substance abuse treatment; (i) Any other services prescribed to treat the patient's mental illness and to either assist the patient in living and functioning in the community or to help prevent a relapse or a deterioration of the patient's current condition. (3) If the person subject to the treatment plan has executed an advance directive for mental health treatment, the treatment team shall consider any directions included in such advance directive in developing the treatment plan. (W) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (X) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (Y) "Local correctional facility" has the same meaning as in section 2903.13 of the Revised Code. (Z) "Clinical nurse specialist" and "certified nurse practitioner" have the same meanings as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (AA) "Criminal court" means a court of common pleas, county court, or municipal court determining the issue of a defendant's competence to stand trial under sections 2945.37, 2945.371, 2945.38, 2945.39, or 2945.401 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.02. (A) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, any person who is eighteen years of age or older and who is, appears to be, or believes self to be mentally ill may make written application for voluntary admission to the chief medical officer of a hospital. (B) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the application also may be made on behalf of a minor by a parent, a guardian of the person, or the person with custody of the minor, and on behalf of an adult incompetent person by the guardian or the person with custody of the incompetent person. Any person whose admission is applied for under division (A) or (B) of this section may be admitted for observation, diagnosis, care, or treatment, in any hospital unless the chief clinical officer finds that hospitalization is inappropriate, and except that, in the case of a public hospital, no person shall be admitted without the authorization of the board of the person's county of residence. (C) If a minor or person adjudicated incompetent due to mental illness whose voluntary admission is applied for under division (B) of this section is admitted, the probate court shall determine, upon petition by private or otherwise appointed counsel, a relative, or one acting as next friend, whether the admission or continued hospitalization is in the best interest of the minor or incompetent. The chief clinical officer shall discharge any voluntary patient who has recovered or whose hospitalization the officer determines to be no longer advisable. In the case of a voluntary patient who refuses to accept treatment consistent with the written treatment plan required by section 5122.27 of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer may file an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. If the chief clinical officer decides not to file such an affidavit and to, instead, discharge the patient, and a trial court or prosecutor had, within the past twelve months, filed an affidavit in probate court or criminal court pursuant to division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code relating to the patient, the chief clinical officer, to the extent that the chief clinical officer has knowledge of the patient's prior status, shall immediately notify such trial court or prosecutor of the intent to discharge. Not later than three court days after being notified of the intent to discharge, the trial court or prosecutor may file or cause to be filed with the probate court or criminal court of the county where the patient is hospitalized, or the probate court or criminal court of the county where the patient resides, an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. If such an affidavit is filed, the patient's discharge must be postponed until a hearing under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code is held. (D) A person who is found incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity and who is committed pursuant to section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code shall not voluntarily admit the person or be voluntarily admitted to a hospital pursuant to this section until after the final termination of the commitment, as described in division (J) of section 2945.401 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.03. A patient admitted under section 5122.02 of the Revised Code who requests release in writing, or whose release is requested in writing by the patient's counsel, legal guardian, parent, spouse, or adult next of kin shall be released forthwith, except when any of the following is the case: (A) The patient was admitted on the patient's own application and the request for release is made by a person other than the patient, release may be conditional upon the agreement of the patient. (B) The patient was, within the past twelve months, a defendant described in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code and the chief clinical officer of the hospital decides not to file or cause to be filed an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code as described in division (C) of this section. In that circumstance, the chief clinical officer shall immediately notify the trial court or prosecutor described in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code of the chief clinical officer's decision and intent to release the patient. Not later than three court days after being notified of the intent to release, the trial court or prosecutor may file or cause to be filed with the probate court or criminal court of the county where the patient is hospitalized, or the probate court or criminal court of the county where the patient resides, an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. If such an affidavit is filed, the patient's release must be postponed until a hearing under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code is held. (C) The chief clinical officer of the hospital, within three court days from the receipt of the request for release, files or causes to be filed with the probate court or criminal court of the county where the patient is hospitalized or of the county where the patient is a resident, an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. Release may be postponed until the hearing held under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code. A telephone communication within three court days from the receipt of the request for release from the chief clinical officer to the court, indicating that the required affidavit has been mailed, is sufficient compliance with the time limit for filing such affidavit. Unless the patient is released within three days from the receipt of the request by the chief clinical officer, the request shall serve as a request for an initial hearing under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code. If the probate court or criminal court finds that the patient is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, all provisions of this chapter with respect to involuntary hospitalization apply to such person. Judicial proceedings for hospitalization shall not be commenced with respect to a voluntary patient except pursuant to this section. Sections 5121.30 to 5121.56 of the Revised Code apply to persons received in a hospital operated by the department of behavioral health on a voluntary application. The chief clinical officer of the hospital shall provide reasonable means and arrangements for informing patients of their rights to release as provided in this section and for assisting them in making and presenting requests for release or for a hearing under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code. Before a patient is released from a public hospital, the chief clinical officer shall, when possible, provide notice of the patient's pending release to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the patient's county of residence. Before the notice is given, the chief clinical officer shall inform the patient that the board will be so notified. Sec. 5122.05. (A) The Subject to section 5122.051 of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer of a hospital may, and the chief clinical officer of a public hospital in all cases of psychiatric medical emergencies, shall receive for observation, diagnosis, care, and treatment any person whose admission is applied for under any of the following procedures: (1) Emergency procedure, as provided in section 5122.10 of the Revised Code; (2) Judicial procedure as provided in sections 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, 2945.402, and 5122.11 to 5122.15 of the Revised Code. Upon application for such admission, the chief clinical officer of a hospital immediately shall notify the board of the patient's county of residence. To assist the hospital in determining whether the patient is subject to involuntary hospitalization and whether alternative services are available, the board or an agency the board designates promptly shall assess the patient unless the board or agency already has performed such assessment, or unless the commitment is pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. (B) No person who is being treated by spiritual means through prayer alone, in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing, may be involuntarily committed unless the probate court or criminal court has determined that the person represents a substantial risk of impairment or injury to self or others; (C) Any person who is involuntarily detained in a hospital or otherwise is in custody under this chapter, immediately upon being taken into custody, shall be informed and provided with a written statement that the person may do any of the following: (1) Immediately make a reasonable number of telephone calls or use other reasonable means to contact an attorney, a licensed physician, or a licensed clinical psychologist, to contact any other person or persons to secure representation by counsel, or to obtain medical or psychological assistance, and be provided assistance in making calls if the assistance is needed and requested; (2) Retain counsel and have independent expert evaluation of the person's mental condition and, if the person is unable to obtain an attorney or independent expert evaluation, be represented by court-appointed counsel or have independent expert evaluation of the person's mental condition, or both, at public expense if the person is indigent; (3) Have a hearing to determine whether or not the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order. Sec. 5122.051. The chief clinical officer of a hospital that contains a mental health unit and participates in the medicaid program shall accept any patient ordered to be committed to the hospital as provided in sections 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, 2945.402, and 5122.11 to 5122.15 of the Revised Code. A hospital that refuses to accept a patient in accordance with this section is ineligible to receive payment under the medicaid program. Sec. 5122.09. If a person taken into custody under section 5122.10 or 5122.11 of the Revised Code is released from custody before having an initial hearing, a probate court or criminal court that has made a file or record relating to the person during this period shall expunge it. Sec. 5122.10. (A)(1) Any of the following who has reason to believe that a person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination may take the person into custody and may immediately transport the person to a hospital or, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, to a general hospital not licensed by the department of behavioral health where the person may be held for the period prescribed in this section: (a) A psychiatrist; (b) A licensed physician; (c) A licensed clinical psychologist; (d) A clinical nurse specialist who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health CNS by the American nurses credentialing center; (e) A certified nurse practitioner who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health NP by the American nurses credentialing center; (f) A health officer; (g) A parole officer; (h) A police officer; (i) A sheriff. (2) If the chief of the adult parole authority or a parole or probation officer with the approval of the chief of the authority has reason to believe that a parolee, an offender under a community control sanction or post-release control sanction, or an offender under transitional control is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination, the chief or officer may take the parolee or offender into custody and may immediately transport the parolee or offender to a hospital or, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, to a general hospital not licensed by the department of behavioral health where the parolee or offender may be held for the period prescribed in this section. (B) A written statement shall be given to the hospital by the individual authorized under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section to transport the person. The statement shall specify the circumstances under which such person was taken into custody and the reasons for the belief that the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination. This statement shall be made available to the respondent or the respondent's attorney upon request of either. (C) Every reasonable and appropriate effort shall be made to take persons into custody in the least conspicuous manner possible. A person taking the respondent into custody pursuant to this section shall explain to the respondent: the name and professional designation and affiliation of the person taking the respondent into custody; that the custody-taking is not a criminal arrest; and that the person is being taken for examination by mental health professionals at a specified mental health facility identified by name. (D) If a person taken into custody under this section is transported to a general hospital, the general hospital may admit the person, or provide care and treatment for the person, or both, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, but by the end of twenty-four hours after arrival at the general hospital, the person shall be transferred to a hospital as defined in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (E) A person transported or transferred to a hospital or community mental health services provider under this section shall be examined by the staff of the hospital or services provider within twenty-four hours after arrival at the hospital or services provider. If to conduct the examination requires that the person remain overnight, the hospital or services provider shall admit the person in an unclassified status until making a disposition under this section. After the examination, if the chief clinical officer of the hospital or services provider believes that the person is not a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the chief clinical officer shall release or discharge the person immediately unless a probate court or criminal court has issued a temporary order of detention applicable to the person under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. After the examination, if the chief clinical officer believes that the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the chief clinical officer may detain the person for not more than three court days following the day of the examination and during such period admit the person as a voluntary patient under section 5122.02 of the Revised Code or file an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. If neither action is taken and a probate court or criminal court has not otherwise issued a temporary order of detention applicable to the person under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer shall discharge the person at the end of the three-day period unless the person has been sentenced to the department of rehabilitation and correction and has not been released from the person's sentence, in which case the person shall be returned to that department. Sec. 5122.11. Proceedings for a person with a mental illness subject to court order pursuant to sections 5122.11 to 5122.15 of the Revised Code shall be commenced by the filing of an affidavit in the manner prescribed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and in a form prescribed in section 5122.111 of the Revised Code, by any . The affidavit shall be filed in either of the following manners: In a probate court by a person or persons with the probate court, either on reliable information or actual knowledge, whichever is determined to be proper by the court. This section does not apply to the hospitalization of a person pursuant to section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. In a criminal court by the trial court or prosecutor, pursuant to division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code. The affidavit shall contain an allegation setting forth the specific category or categories under division (B) of section 5122.01 of the Revised Code upon which the jurisdiction of the probate court or criminal court is based and a statement of alleged facts sufficient to indicate probable cause to believe that the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order. The affidavit may be accompanied, or the court may require that the affidavit be accompanied, by a certificate of a psychiatrist, or a certificate signed by a licensed clinical psychologist and a certificate signed by a licensed physician stating that the person who issued the certificate has examined the person and is of the opinion that the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, or shall be accompanied by a written statement by the applicant, under oath, that the person has refused to submit to an examination by a psychiatrist, or by a licensed clinical psychologist and licensed physician. With regard to a defendant described in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code for whom criminal charges were dismissed, the affidavit shall contain a space for the trial court or prosecutor filing the affidavit to indicate that the person named in the affidavit is such a defendant. Upon receipt of the affidavit, if a judge of the probate court or criminal court or a referee who is an attorney at law appointed by the court has probable cause to believe that the person named in the affidavit is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the judge or referee may issue a temporary order of detention ordering any health or police officer or sheriff to take into custody and transport the person to a hospital or other place designated in section 5122.17 of the Revised Code, or may set the matter for further hearing. If a temporary order of detention is issued and the person is transported to a hospital or other designated place, the court that issued the order shall retain jurisdiction over the case as it relates to the person's outpatient treatment, notwithstanding that the hospital or other designated place to which the person is transported is outside the territorial jurisdiction of the court. The person may be observed and treated until the hearing provided for in section 5122.141 of the Revised Code. If no such hearing is held, the person may be observed and treated until the hearing provided for in section 5122.15 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.111. To initiate proceedings for court-ordered treatment of a person under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, a person or persons shall file an affidavit with the probate court or a trial court or prosecutor shall file an affidavit with the criminal court that is identical in form and content to the following: AFFIDAVIT OF MENTAL ILLNESS The State of Ohio ____________________ County, ss. ____________________ Court ________________________________________________________________the undersigned, residing at ________________________________________________________________says, that he/she has information to believe or has actual knowledge that ________________________________________________________________(Please specify specific category(ies) below with an X.) [ ] Represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self as manifested by evidence of threats of, or attempts at, suicide or serious self-inflicted bodily harm; [ ] Represents a substantial risk of physical harm to others as manifested by evidence of recent homicidal or other violent behavior or evidence of recent threats that place another in reasonable fear of violent behavior and serious physical harm or other evidence of present dangerousness; [ ] Represents a substantial and immediate risk of serious physical impairment or injury to self as manifested by evidence of being unable to provide for and of not providing for basic physical needs because of mental illness and that appropriate provision for such needs cannot be made immediately available in the community; [ ] Would benefit from treatment for mental illness and is in need of such treatment as manifested by evidence of behavior that creates a grave and imminent risk to substantial rights of others or the person; or [ ] Would benefit from treatment as manifested by evidence of behavior that indicates all of the following: (a) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision, based on a clinical determination. (b) The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for mental illness and one of the following applies: (i) At least twice within the thirty-six months prior to the filing of an affidavit seeking court-ordered treatment of the person under section 5122.111 of the Revised Code, the lack of compliance has been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization in a hospital or receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a correctional facility, provided that the thirty-six-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the thirty-six-month period. (ii) Within the forty-eight months prior to the filing of an affidavit seeking court-ordered treatment of the person under section 5122.111 of the Revised Code, the lack of compliance resulted in one or more acts of serious violent behavior toward self or others or threats of, or attempts at, serious physical harm to self or others, provided that the forty-eight-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the forty-eight-month period. (c) The person, as a result of mental illness, is unlikely to voluntarily participate in necessary treatment. (d) In view of the person's treatment history and current behavior, the person is in need of treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in substantial risk of serious harm to the person or others. ________________________________________________________________ (Name of the party filing the affidavit) further says that the facts supporting this belief are as follows: ________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ These facts being sufficient to indicate probable cause that the above said person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order. The undersigned represents a trial court or a prosecutor who, as described in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code, is alleging that the above said person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order: [ ] Yes [ ] No (please specify answer with an X). If Yes, please specify the name and address of the trial court or prosecutor: ________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ Name of Patient's Last Physician or Licensed Clinical Psychologist ________________________________________________________________Address of Patient's Last Physician or Licensed Clinical Psychologist ________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ The name and address of respondent's legal guardian, spouse, and adult next of kin are: Name Kinship Address __________ Legal Guardian __________ - __________ __________ Spouse __________ - __________ __________ Adult Next of Kin __________ - __________ __________ Adult Next of Kin __________ - __________ The following constitutes additional information that may be necessary for the purpose of determining residence: ________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ Dated this _____________ day of _______________, 20___ _____________________________ Signature of the party filing - the affidavit Sworn to before me and signed in my presence on the day and year above dated. ____________________________ Signature of Probate Judge, - Deputy Clerk, or Notary - Public WAIVER I, the undersigned party filing the affidavit hereby waive the issuing and service of notice of the hearing on said affidavit, and voluntarily enter my appearance herein. Dated this _____________ day of _______________, 20___ _____________________________ Signature of the party filing the affidavit Sec. 5122.112. A probate court or criminal court that terminates jurisdiction over a defendant described in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code, for whom a trial court or prosecutor initiated proceedings alleging that the defendant is a mentally ill person subject to court order pursuant to sections 5122.11 to 5122.15 of the Revised Code, shall immediately do both of the following: (A) Notify the initiating court or prosecutor of the termination; (B) Transmit to the initiating court a copy of any records in its possession that pertain to the defendant's mental illness or treatment for mental illness. Sec. 5122.12. After receipt of the affidavit required by section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, the probate court or criminal court shall cause written notice by mail or otherwise of any hearing as the court directs to be given to the following persons: (A) The respondent; (B) The respondent's legal guardian, if any, the respondent's spouse, if any, and the respondent's parents, if the respondent is a minor, if these persons' addresses are known to the court or can be obtained through exercise of reasonable diligence; (C) The person who filed the affidavit; (D) Any one person designated by the respondent; but if the respondent does not make a selection, the notice shall be sent to the adult next of kin other than the person who filed the affidavit if that person's address is known to the court or can be obtained through exercise of reasonable diligence; (E) The respondent's counsel; (F) The director, chief clinical officer, or the respective designee of the hospital, board, community mental health services provider, or facility to which the person has been committed; (G) The board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the respondent's county of residence or a services provider the board designates. Any person entitled to notice under this section, with the exception of the respondent, may waive the notice. A copy of the affidavit and temporary order of detention shall be served with the notice to the parties and to respondent's counsel, if counsel has been appointed or retained. Sec. 5122.13. Within two business days after receipt of the affidavit required by section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, the probate court or criminal court shall refer the affidavit to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or community mental health services provider the board designates to assist the court in determining whether the respondent is subject to court-ordered treatment and whether alternatives to hospitalization are available, unless the services provider or board has already performed such screening. The board or services provider shall review the allegations of the affidavit and other information relating to whether or not the person named in the affidavit or statement is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, and the availability of appropriate treatment alternatives. The person who conducts the investigation shall promptly make a report to the probate court or criminal court, in writing, in open court or in chambers, as directed by the court and a full record of the report shall be made by the court. The report is not admissible as evidence for the purpose of establishing whether or not the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, but shall be considered by the court in its determination of an appropriate placement for any person after that person is found to be a person with a mental illness subject to court order. The probate court or criminal court, prior to the hearing under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code, shall release a copy of the investigative report to the respondent's counsel. Nothing in this section precludes a judge or referee from issuing a temporary order of detention pursuant to section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.14. Immediately after acceptance of an affidavit required under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, the probate court or criminal court may appoint a psychiatrist, or a licensed clinical psychologist and a licensed physician to examine the respondent, and at the first hearing held pursuant to section 5122.141 of the Revised Code, such psychiatrist, or licensed clinical psychologist and licensed physician, shall report to the court histhe findings of the examination as to the mental condition of the respondent, and histhe respondent's need for custody, care, or treatment in a mental hospital. The court may accept as evidence the written report of a psychiatrist, or the written report of a licensed clinical psychologist and a licensed physician, designated by the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services as the report and findings referred to in this section. The examination, if possible, shall be held at a hospital or other medical facility, at the home of the respondent, or at any other suitable place least likely to have a harmful effect on the respondent's health. The probate court or criminal court shall prior to a hearing under section 5122.141 or 5122.15 of the Revised Code release a copy of the report to the respondent's counsel. Sec. 5122.141. (A) A respondent who is involuntarily placed in a hospital or other place as designated in section 5122.10 or 5122.17 of the Revised Code, or with respect to whom proceedings have been instituted under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, shall be afforded a hearing to determine whether or not the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to section 5122.15 of the Revised Code, and the respondent shall have the right to counsel as provided in that section. (B) The hearing shall be conducted within five court days from the day on which the respondent is detained or an affidavit is filed, whichever occurs first, in a physical setting not likely to have a harmful effect on the respondent, and may be conducted in a hospital in or out of the county. On the motion of the respondent, the respondent's counsel, the chief clinical officer, or on its own motion, and for good cause shown, the probate court or criminal court may order a continuance of the hearing. The continuance may be for no more than ten days from the day on which the respondent is detained or on which an affidavit is filed, whichever occurs first. Failure to conduct the hearing within this time shall effect an immediate discharge of the respondent. If the proceedings are not reinstituted within thirty days, all records of the proceedings shall be expunged. (C) If the probate court or criminal court does not find that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, it shall order the respondent's immediate discharge, and shall expunge all record of the proceedings during this period. (D) If the probate court or criminal court finds that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court may issue an interim order of detention ordering any health or police officer or sheriff to take into custody and transport such person to a hospital or other place designated in section 5122.17 of the Revised Code, where the respondent may be observed and treated. (E) A respondent or a respondent's counsel, after obtaining the consent of the respondent, may waive the hearing provided for in this section. In such case, unless the person has been discharged, a mandatory full hearing shall be held by the thirtieth day after the original involuntary detention of the respondent. Failure to conduct the mandatory full hearing within this time limit shall result in the immediate discharge of the respondent. (F) Where possible, the initial hearing shall be held before the respondent is taken into custody. Sec. 5122.15. (A) Full hearings shall be conducted in a manner consistent with this chapter and with due process of law. The hearings shall be conducted by a judge of the probate court or criminal court or a referee designated by a judge of the probate court or criminal court and may be conducted in or out of the county in which the respondent is held. Any referee designated under this division shall be an attorney. (1) With the consent of the respondent, the following shall be made available to counsel for the respondent: (a) All relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of the state or prosecutor; (b) All relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of the hospital in which the respondent currently is held, or in which the respondent has been held pursuant to this chapter; (c) All relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of any hospital, facility, or person not included in division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (2) The respondent has the right to attend the hearing and to be represented by counsel of the respondent's choice. The right to attend the hearing may be waived only by the respondent or counsel for the respondent after consultation with the respondent. (3) If the respondent is not represented by counsel, is absent from the hearing, and has not validly waived the right to counsel, the probate court or criminal court shall appoint counsel immediately to represent the respondent at the hearing, reserving the right to tax costs of appointed counsel to the respondent, unless it is shown that the respondent is indigent. If the court appoints counsel, or if the court determines that the evidence relevant to the respondent's absence does not justify the absence, the court shall continue the case. (4) The respondent shall be informed that the respondent may retain counsel and have independent expert evaluation. If the respondent is unable to obtain an attorney, the respondent shall be represented by court-appointed counsel. If the respondent is indigent, court-appointed counsel and independent expert evaluation shall be provided as an expense under section 5122.43 of the Revised Code. (5) The hearing shall be closed to the public, unless counsel for the respondent, with the permission of the respondent, requests that the hearing be open to the public. (6) If the hearing is closed to the public, the probate court or criminal court, for good cause shown, may admit persons who have a legitimate interest in the proceedings. If the respondent, the respondent's counsel, or the designee of the director or of the chief clinical officer objects to the admission of any person, the court shall hear the objection and any opposing argument and shall rule upon the admission of the person to the hearing. (7) The affiant under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code shall be subject to subpoena by either party. (8) The probate court or criminal court shall examine the sufficiency of all documents filed and shall inform the respondent, if present, and the respondent's counsel of the nature and content of the documents and the reason for which the respondent is being detained, or for which the respondent's placement is being sought. (9) The probate court or criminal court shall receive only reliable, competent, and material evidence. (10) Unless proceedings are initiated pursuant to section 5120.17 or 5139.08 of the Revised Code, an attorney that the board designates shall present the case demonstrating that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order. The attorney shall offer evidence of the diagnosis, prognosis, record of treatment, if any, and less restrictive treatment plans, if any. In proceedings pursuant to section 5120.17 or 5139.08 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall designate an attorney who shall present the case demonstrating that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order. The attorney shall offer evidence of the diagnosis, prognosis, record of treatment, if any, and less restrictive treatment plans, if any. (11) The respondent or the respondent's counsel has the right to subpoena witnesses and documents and to examine and cross-examine witnesses. (12) The respondent has the right, but shall not be compelled, to testify, and shall be so advised by the probate court or criminal court. (13) On motion of the respondent or the respondent's counsel for good cause shown, or on the probate court's or criminal court's own motion, the court may order a continuance of the hearing. (14) If the respondent is represented by counsel and the respondent's counsel requests a transcript and record, or if the respondent is not represented by counsel, the probate court or criminal court shall make and maintain a full transcript and record of the proceeding. If the respondent is indigent and the transcript and record is made, a copy shall be provided to the respondent upon request and be treated as an expense under section 5122.43 of the Revised Code. (15) To the extent not inconsistent with this chapter, the Rules of Civil Procedure are applicable. (B) Unless, upon completion of the hearing the probate court or criminal court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, it shall order the respondent's discharge immediately. (C) If, upon completion of the hearing, the probate court or criminal court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court shall order the respondent for a period not to exceed ninety days to any of the following: (1) A hospital operated by the department of behavioral health if the respondent is committed pursuant to section 5139.08 of the Revised Code; (2) A nonpublic hospital; (3) The veterans' administration or other agency of the United States government; (4) A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or services provider the board designates; (5) Receive private psychiatric or psychological care and treatment; (6) Any other suitable facility or person consistent with the diagnosis, prognosis, and treatment needs of the respondent. A jail or other local correctional facility is not a suitable facility. (D) Any order made pursuant to division (C)(2), (3), (5), or (6) of this section shall be conditioned upon the receipt by the probate court or criminal court of consent by the hospital, facility, agency, or person to accept the respondent and may include a requirement that a person or entity described in division (C)(2), (3), (5), or (6) of this section inform the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or community mental health services provider the board designates about the progress of the respondent with the treatment plan. (E) In determining the entity or person to which the respondent is to be committed under division (C) of this section, the probate court or criminal court shall consider all of the following: (1) The respondent's diagnosis and prognosis made by a psychiatrist, licensed clinical psychologist, clinical nurse specialist who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health clinical nurse specialist by the American nurses credentialing center, or certified nurse practitioner who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health nurse practitioner by the American nurses credentialing center; (2) The respondent's preferences; (3) The respondent's projected treatment plan. The probate court or criminal court shall order the implementation of the least restrictive alternative available and consistent with treatment goals. If the court determines that the least restrictive alternative available that is consistent with treatment goals is inpatient hospitalization, the court's order shall so state. (F) During the ninety-day period the entity or person shall examine and treat the respondent. If the respondent is receiving treatment in an outpatient setting, or receives treatment in an outpatient setting during a subsequent period of continued commitment under division (H) of this section, the entity or person to whom the respondent is committed shall determine the appropriate outpatient treatment for the respondent. If, at any time prior to the expiration of the ninety-day period, it is determined by the entity or person that the respondent's treatment needs could be equally well met in an available and appropriate less restrictive setting, both of the following apply: (1) The respondent shall be released from the care of the entity or person immediately and shall be referred to the probate court or criminal court together with a report of the findings and recommendations of the entity or person; (2) The entity or person shall notify the respondent's counsel or the attorney designated by a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or, if the respondent was committed to a board or a services provider designated by the board, it shall place the respondent in the least restrictive setting available consistent with treatment goals and notify the probate court or criminal court and the respondent's counsel of the placement. The probate court or criminal court shall dismiss the case or order placement in the least restrictive setting. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (G)(2) of this section, any person for whom proceedings for treatment have been commenced pursuant to section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, may apply at any time for voluntary admission or treatment to the entity or person to which the person was committed. Upon admission as a voluntary patient the chief clinical officer of the entity or the person immediately shall notify the probate court or criminal court, the patient's counsel, and the attorney designated by the board, if the attorney has entered the proceedings, in writing of that fact, and, upon receipt of the notice, the court shall dismiss the case. (2) A person who is found incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity and who is committed pursuant to section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code shall not voluntarily commit the person pursuant to this section until after the final termination of the commitment, as described in division (J) of section 2945.401 of the Revised Code. (H) If, at the end of the first ninety-day period or any subsequent period of continued commitment, there has been no disposition of the case, either by discharge or voluntary admission or treatment, the entity or person shall discharge the patient immediately, unless at least ten days before the expiration of the period the attorney the board designates or the prosecutor files with the probate court or criminal court an application for continued commitment. The application of the attorney or the prosecutor shall include a written report containing the diagnosis, prognosis, past treatment, a list of alternative treatment settings and plans, and identification of the treatment setting that is the least restrictive consistent with treatment needs. The attorney the board designates or the prosecutor shall file the written report at least three days prior to the full hearing. A copy of the application and written report shall be provided to the respondent's counsel immediately. The probate court or criminal court shall hold a full hearing on applications for continued commitment at the expiration of the first ninety-day period and at least every two years after the expiration of the first ninety-day period. Hearings following any application for continued commitment are mandatory and may not be waived. For a respondent who is ordered to receive treatment in an outpatient setting, if at any time after the first ninety-day period the entity or person to whom the respondent was ordered determines that the respondent has demonstrated voluntary consent for treatment, that entity or person shall immediately notify the respondent, the respondent's counsel, the attorney designated by the board, and the probate court or criminal court. The entity or person shall submit to the court a report of the findings and recommendations. The court may dismiss the case upon review of the facts. Upon request of a person who is involuntarily committed under this section, or the person's counsel, that is made more than one hundred eighty days after the person's last full hearing, mandatory or requested, the probate court or criminal court shall hold a full hearing on the person's continued commitment. Upon the application of a person involuntarily committed under this section, supported by an affidavit of a psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist, alleging that the person no longer is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court for good cause shown may hold a full hearing on the person's continued commitment prior to the expiration of one hundred eighty days after the person's last full hearing. Section 5122.12 of the Revised Code applies to all hearings on continued commitment. If the probate court or criminal court, after a hearing for continued commitment finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court may order continued commitment at places or to persons specified in division (C) of this section. (I) Unless the admission is pursuant to section 5120.17 or 5139.08 of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer of the entity admitting a respondent pursuant to a judicial proceeding, within ten working days of the admission, shall make a report of the admission to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the respondent's county of residence. (J) A referee appointed by the probate court or criminal court may make all orders that a judge may make under this section and sections 5122.11 and 5122.141 of the Revised Code, except an order of contempt of court. The orders of a referee take effect immediately. Within fourteen days of the making of an order by a referee, a party may file written objections to the order with the court. The filed objections shall be considered a motion, shall be specific, and shall state their grounds with particularity. Within ten days of the filing of the objections, a judge of the court shall hold a hearing on the objections and may hear and consider any testimony or other evidence relating to the respondent's mental condition. At the conclusion of the hearing, the judge may ratify, rescind, or modify the referee's order. (K) An order of the probate court or criminal court under division (C), (H), or (J) of this section is a final order. (L) Before a board, or a services provider the board designates, may place an unconsenting respondent in an inpatient setting from a less restrictive placement, the board or services provider shall do all of the following: (1) Determine that the respondent is in immediate need of treatment in an inpatient setting because the respondent represents a substantial risk of physical harm to the respondent or others if allowed to remain in a less restrictive setting; (2) On the day of placement in the inpatient setting or on the next court day, file with the probate court or criminal court a motion for transfer to an inpatient setting or communicate to the court by telephone that the required motion has been mailed; (3) Ensure that every reasonable and appropriate effort is made to take the respondent to the inpatient setting in the least conspicuous manner possible; (4) Immediately notify the board's designated attorney and the respondent's attorney. At the respondent's request, the probate court or criminal court shall hold a hearing on the motion and make a determination pursuant to division (E) of this section within five days of the placement. (M) Before a board, or a services provider the board designates, may move a respondent from one residential placement to another, the board or services provider shall consult with the respondent about the placement. If the respondent objects to the placement, the proposed placement and the need for it shall be reviewed by a qualified mental health professional who otherwise is not involved in the treatment of the respondent. (N) The entity or person to whom the respondent was ordered for treatment in an outpatient setting may submit a report to the probate court or criminal court indicating that the respondent has either failed to comply with the treatment plan or begun to demonstrate signs of decompensation that may be grounds for hospitalization. On receipt of the report, the court shall promptly schedule a hearing to review the case. The court shall conduct the hearing in a manner consistent with this chapter and due process of law. The board shall receive notice of the hearing and the board and entity or person treating the respondent shall submit a report to the court with a plan for appropriate alternative treatment, if any, or recommend that the court discontinue the court-ordered treatment. The court shall consider available and appropriate alternative placements but shall not impose criminal sanctions that result in confinement in a jail or other local correctional facility based on the respondent's failure to comply with the treatment plan. The court may not order the respondent to a more restrictive placement unless the criteria specified in division (L) of this section are met and may not order the respondent to an inpatient setting unless the court determines by clear and convincing evidence presented by the board that the respondent meets the criteria specified in divisions (A) and (B)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.20. The director of behavioral health or the director's designee may transfer, or authorize the transfer of, an involuntary patient, or a consenting voluntary patient hospitalized pursuant to section 5122.02 or sections 5122.11 to 5122.15 of the Revised Code, from one public hospital to another, or to a hospital, community mental health services provider, or other facility offering treatment or other services for mental illness, if the medical director of the department of behavioral health determines that it would be consistent with the medical needs of the patient to do so. If such a transfer is made to a private facility, the transfer shall be conditioned upon the consent of the facility. Before an involuntary patient may be transferred to a more restrictive setting, the chief clinical officer shall file a motion with the probate court or criminal court requesting the court to amend its order of placement issued under section 5122.15 of the Revised Code. At the patient's request, the court shall hold a hearing on the motion at which the patient has the same rights as at a full hearing under section 5122.15 of the Revised Code. The hearing shall be held within ten days after the date on which the respondent was transferred to the more restrictive setting or on which the motion was filed, whichever is earlier. On the motion of the respondent, the respondent's counsel, or the chief clinical officer, or on its own motion, and for good cause shown, the court may order a continuance of the hearing for up to ten days. Whenever an involuntary patient is transferred, written notice of the transfer shall be given to the patient's legal guardian, parents, spouse, and counsel, or, if none is known, to the patient's nearest known relative or friend. If the patient is a minor, the department, before making such a transfer, shall make a minute of the order for the transfer and the reason for it upon its record and shall send a certified copy at least seven days prior to the transfer to the person shown by its record to have had the care or custody of the minor immediately prior to the minor's commitment. Whenever a consenting voluntary patient is transferred, the notification shall be given only at the patient's request. The chief clinical officer shall advise a voluntary patient who is being transferred that the patient may decide if the notification shall be given. In all such transfers, due consideration shall be given to the wishes of the patient, and the relationship of the patient to the patient's family, legal guardian, or friends, so as to maintain the relationship and encourage visits beneficial to the patient. When a voluntary patient whose medical or psychological needs are found by the chief clinical officer to warrant a transfer refuses to be transferred to an alternate facility, the chief clinical officer may file an affidavit for a hearing under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.23. The chief clinical officer of a public hospital shall immediately report to the department of behavioral health and the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the patient's county of residence the removal, death, escape, discharge, or trial visit of any patient hospitalized under section 5122.15 of the Revised Code, or the return of such an escaped or visiting patient to the department, the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county from which such patient was hospitalized, and the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county of residence of such patient. In case of death, the chief clinical officer also shall notify one or more of the nearest relatives of the deceased patient, if known to the chief clinical officer, by letter, telegram, or telephone. If the place of residence of such relative is unknown to the chief clinical officer, immediately upon receiving notification the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court shall in the speediest manner possible notify such relatives, if known to the probate judge. The chief clinical officer of a public hospital, upon the request of the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county from which a patient was hospitalized or the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county of residence of such a patient, shall make a report to the judge of the condition of any patient under the care, treatment, custody, or control of the chief clinical officer. Sec. 5122.25. Upon the request of a hospital, person, board, community mental health services provider, or facility who has custody of a patient hospitalized pursuant to section 5122.15 of the Revised Code, or on the order of the probate court or criminal court, such patient may be called for a rehearing at such place within the county of the patient's residence or the county where such patient is hospitalized as the court designates. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to section 5122.15 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.26. (A) If a patient is absent without leave, on a verbal or written order issued within five days of the time of the unauthorized absence by the department of behavioral health, the chief clinical officer of the hospital from which the patient is absent without leave, or the probate court or criminal court of either the county from which the patient was committed or in which the patient is found, any health or police officer or sheriff may take the patient into custody and transport the patient to the hospital in which the patient was hospitalized or to a place that is designated in the order. The officer immediately shall report such fact to the entity that issued the order. The chief clinical officer of a hospital may discharge a patient who is under an indictment, a sentence of imprisonment, a community control sanction, or a post-release control sanction or on parole and who has been absent without leave for more than thirty days but shall give written notice of the discharge to the court with criminal jurisdiction over the patient. The chief clinical officer of a hospital may discharge any other patient who has been absent without leave for more than fourteen days. The chief clinical officer shall take all proper measures for the apprehension of an escaped patient. The expense of the return of an escaped patient shall be borne by the hospital where the patient is hospitalized. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, no patient hospitalized under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code whose absence without leave was caused or contributed to by the patient's mental illness shall be subject to a charge of escape. (2) Division (B)(1) of this section does not apply to any person who was hospitalized, institutionalized, or confined in a facility under an order made pursuant to or under authority of section 2945.37, 2945.371, 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code and who escapes from the facility, from confinement in a vehicle for transportation to or from the facility, or from supervision by an employee of the facility that is incidental to hospitalization, institutionalization, or confinement in the facility and that occurs outside the facility, in violation of section 2921.34 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.27. The chief clinical officer of the hospital or the chief clinical officer's designee shall assure that all patients hospitalized or committed pursuant to this chapter shall: (A) Receive, within twenty days of their admission sufficient professional care to assure that an evaluation of current status, differential diagnosis, probable prognosis, and description of the current treatment plan is stated on the official chart; (B) Have a written treatment plan consistent with the evaluation, diagnosis, prognosis, and goals which shall be provided, upon request of the patient or patient's counsel, to the patient's counsel and to any private physician or licensed clinical psychologist designated by the patient or the patient's counsel or to the Ohio protection and advocacy system; (C) Receive treatment consistent with the treatment plan. The department of behavioral health shall set standards for treatment provided to such patients, consistent wherever possible with standards set by the joint commission. (D) Receive periodic reevaluations of the treatment plan by the professional staff at intervals not to exceed ninety days; (E) Be provided with adequate medical treatment for physical disease or injury; (F) Receive humane care and treatment, including without limitation, the following: (1) The least restrictive environment consistent with the treatment plan; (2) The necessary facilities and personnel required by the treatment plan; (3) A humane psychological and physical environment; (4) The right to obtain current information concerning the patient's treatment program and expectations in terms that the patient can reasonably understand; (5) Participation in programs designed to afford the patient substantial opportunity to acquire skills to facilitate return to the community or to terminate an involuntary commitment; (6) The right to be free from unnecessary or excessive medication; (7) Freedom from restraints or isolation unless it is stated in a written order by the chief clinical officer or the chief clinical officer's designee, or the patient's individual physician or psychologist in a private or general hospital. If the chief clinical officer of the hospital is unable to provide the treatment required by divisions (C), (E), and (F) of this section for any patient hospitalized pursuant to Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer shall immediately notify the patient, the probate court or criminal court, the Ohio protection and advocacy system, the director of behavioral health, and the patient's counsel and legal guardian, if known. If within ten days after receipt of such notification by the director, the director is unable to effect a transfer of the patient, pursuant to section 5122.20 of the Revised Code, to a hospital, community mental health services provider, or other medical facility where treatment is available, or has not received an order of the court to the contrary, the involuntary commitment of any patient hospitalized pursuant to Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code and defined as a person with a mental illness subject to court order under division (B)(4) of section 5122.01 of the Revised Code shall automatically be terminated. Sec. 5122.271. (A) Except as provided in divisions (C), (D), and (E) of this section, the chief clinical officer or, in a nonpublic hospital, the attending physician responsible for a patient's care shall provide all information, including expected physical and medical consequences, necessary to enable any patient of a hospital for persons with mental illnesses to give a fully informed, intelligent, and knowing consent, the opportunity to consult with independent specialists and counsel, and the right to refuse consent for any of the following: (1) Surgery; (2) Convulsive therapy; (3) Major aversive interventions; (4) Sterilizations; (5) Any unusually hazardous treatment procedures; (6) Psycho-surgery. (B) No patient shall be subjected to any of the procedures listed in divisions (A)(4) to (6) of this section until both the patient's informed, intelligent, and knowing consent and the approval of the probate court or criminal court have been obtained, except that court approval is not required for a legally competent and voluntary patient in a nonpublic hospital. (C) If, after providing the information required under division (A) of this section to the patient, the chief clinical officer or attending physician concludes that a patient is physically or mentally unable to receive the information required for surgery under division (A)(1) of this section, or has been adjudicated incompetent, the information may be provided to the patient's natural or court-appointed guardian, who may give an informed, intelligent, and knowing written consent. If a patient is physically or mentally unable to receive the information required for surgery under division (A)(1) of this section and has no guardian, the information, the recommendation of the chief clinical officer, and the concurring judgment of a licensed physician who is not a full-time employee of the state may be provided to the probate court or criminal court in the county in which the hospital is located, which may approve the surgery. Before approving the surgery, the court shall notify the Ohio protection and advocacy system created by section 5123.60 of the Revised Code, and shall notify the patient of the rights to consult with counsel, to have counsel appointed by the court if the patient is indigent, and to contest the recommendation of the chief clinical officer. (D) If, in a medical emergency, and after providing the information required under division (A) of this section to the patient, it is the judgment of one licensed physician that delay in obtaining surgery would create a grave danger to the health of the patient, it may be administered without the consent of the patient or the patient's guardian if the necessary information is provided to the patient's spouse or next of kin to enable that person to give informed, intelligent, and knowing written consent. If no spouse or next of kin can reasonably be contacted, or if the spouse or next of kin is contacted, but refuses to consent, the surgery may be performed upon the written authorization of the chief clinical officer or, in a nonpublic hospital, upon the written authorization of the attending physician responsible for the patient's care, and after the approval of the probate court or criminal court has been obtained. However, if delay in obtaining court approval would create a grave danger to the life of the patient, the chief clinical officer or, in a nonpublic hospital, the attending physician responsible for the patient's care may authorize surgery, in writing, without court approval. If the surgery is authorized without court approval, the chief clinical officer or the attending physician who made the authorization and the physician who performed the surgery shall each execute an affidavit describing the circumstances constituting the emergency and warranting the surgery and the circumstances warranting their not obtaining prior court approval. The affidavit shall be filed with the court with which the request for prior approval would have been filed within five court days after the surgery, and a copy of the affidavit shall be placed in the patient's file and be given to the guardian, spouse, or next of kin of the patient, to the hospital at which the surgery was performed, and to the Ohio protection and advocacy system as defined in section 5123.60 of the Revised Code. (E) Major aversive interventions shall not be used unless a patient continues to engage in behavior destructive to self or others after other forms of therapy have been attempted. Major aversive interventions may be applied if approved by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Major aversive interventions shall not be applied to a voluntary patient without the informed, intelligent, and knowing written consent of the patient or the patient's guardian. (F) Unless there is substantial risk of physical harm to self or others, or other than under division (D) of this section, this chapter does not authorize any form of compulsory medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment of any patient who is being treated by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing without specific probate court or criminal court authorization. (G) For purposes of this section, "convulsive therapy" does not include defibrillation. Sec. 5122.29. All patients hospitalized or committed pursuant to this chapter have the following rights: (A) The right to a written list of all rights enumerated in this chapter, to that person, that person's legal guardian, and that person's counsel. If the person is unable to read, the list shall be read and explained to the person. (B) The right at all times to be treated with consideration and respect for the patient's privacy and dignity, including without limitation, the following: (1) At the time a person is taken into custody for diagnosis, detention, or treatment under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code, the person taking that person into custody shall take reasonable precautions to preserve and safeguard the personal property in the possession of or on the premises occupied by that person; (2) A person who is committed, voluntarily or involuntarily, shall be given reasonable protection from assault or battery by any other person. (C) The right to communicate freely with and be visited at reasonable times by the patient's private counsel or personnel of the Ohio protection and advocacy system and, unless prior probate court or criminal court restriction has been obtained, to communicate freely with and be visited at reasonable times by the patient's personal physician or psychologist. (D) The right to communicate freely with others, unless specifically restricted in the patient's treatment plan for clear treatment reasons, including without limitation the following: (1) To receive visitors at reasonable times; (2) To have reasonable access to telephones to make and receive confidential calls, including a reasonable number of free calls if unable to pay for them and assistance in calling if requested and needed. (E) The right to have ready access to letter writing materials, including a reasonable number of stamps without cost if unable to pay for them, and to mail and receive unopened correspondence and assistance in writing if requested and needed. (F) The right to the following personal privileges consistent with health and safety: (1) To wear the patient's own clothes and maintain the patient's own personal effects; (2) To be provided an adequate allowance for or allotment of neat, clean, and seasonable clothing if unable to provide the patient's own; (3) To maintain the patient's personal appearance according to the patient's own personal taste, including head and body hair; (4) To keep and use personal possessions, including toilet articles; (5) To have access to individual storage space for the patient's private use; (6) To keep and spend a reasonable sum of the patient's own money for expenses and small purchases; (7) To receive and possess reading materials without censorship, except when the materials create a clear and present danger to the safety of persons in the facility. (G) The right to reasonable privacy, including both periods of privacy and places of privacy. (H) The right to free exercise of religious worship within the facility, including a right to services and sacred texts that are within the reasonable capacity of the facility to supply, provided that no patient shall be coerced into engaging in any religious activities. (I) The right to social interaction with members of either sex, subject to adequate supervision, unless such social interaction is specifically withheld under a patient's written treatment plan for clear treatment reasons. As used in this section, "clear treatment reasons" means that permitting the patient to communicate freely with others will present a substantial risk of physical harm to the patient or others or will substantially preclude effective treatment of the patient. If a right provided under this section is restricted or withheld for clear treatment reasons, the patient's written treatment plan shall specify the treatment designed to eliminate the restriction or withholding of the right at the earliest possible time. Sec. 5122.31. (A) All certificates, applications, records, and reports made for the purpose of this chapter and sections 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, and 2945.402 of the Revised Code, other than probate court or criminal court journal entries or probate court or criminal court docket entries, and directly or indirectly identifying a patient or former patient or person whose hospitalization or commitment has been sought under this chapter, shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person except: (1) If the person identified, or the person's legal guardian, if any, or if the person is a minor, the person's parent or legal guardian, consents, and if the disclosure is in the best interests of the person, as may be determined by the probate court or criminal court for judicial records and by the chief clinical officer for medical records; (2) When disclosure is provided for in this chapter or Chapters 340. or 5119. of the Revised Code or in accordance with other provisions of state or federal law authorizing such disclosure; (3) That hospitals, boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, and community mental health services providers may release necessary medical information to insurers and other third-party payers, including government entities responsible for processing and authorizing payment, to obtain payment for goods and services furnished to the patient; (4) Pursuant to a probate court or criminal court order signed by a judge; (5) That a patient shall be granted access to the patient's own psychiatric and medical records, unless access specifically is restricted in a patient's treatment plan for clear treatment reasons; (6) That hospitals and other institutions and facilities within the department of behavioral health may exchange psychiatric records and other pertinent information with other hospitals, institutions, and facilities of the department, and with community mental health services providers and boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services with which the department has a current agreement for patient care or services. Records and information that may be released pursuant to this division shall be limited to medication history, physical health status and history, financial status, summary of course of treatment in the hospital, summary of treatment needs, and a discharge summary, if any. (7) That hospitals within the department and other institutions and facilities within the department may exchange psychiatric records and other pertinent information with payers and other providers of treatment, health services, and recovery supports if the purpose of the exchange is to facilitate continuity of care for a patient or for the emergency treatment of an individual; (8) That a patient's family member who is involved in the provision, planning, and monitoring of services to the patient may receive medication information, a summary of the patient's diagnosis and prognosis, and a list of the services and personnel available to assist the patient and the patient's family, if the patient's treating physician determines that the disclosure would be in the best interests of the patient. No such disclosure shall be made unless the patient is notified first and receives the information and does not object to the disclosure. (9) That community mental health services providers may exchange psychiatric records and certain other information with the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services and other services providers in order to provide services to a person involuntarily committed to a board. Release of records under this division shall be limited to medication history, physical health status and history, financial status, summary of course of treatment, summary of treatment needs, and discharge summary, if any. (10) That information may be disclosed to the executor or the administrator of an estate of a deceased patient when the information is necessary to administer the estate; (11) That records in the possession of the Ohio history connection may be released to the closest living relative of a deceased patient upon request of that relative; (12) That records pertaining to the patient's diagnosis, course of treatment, treatment needs, and prognosis shall be disclosed and released to the appropriate prosecuting attorney if the patient was committed pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code, or to the attorney designated by the board for proceedings pursuant to involuntary commitment under this chapter. (13) That the department of behavioral health may exchange psychiatric hospitalization records, other mental health treatment records, and other pertinent information with the department of rehabilitation and correction and with the department of youth services to ensure continuity of care for inmates or offenders who are receiving mental health services in an institution of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services and may exchange psychiatric hospitalization records, other mental health treatment records, and other pertinent information with boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services and community mental health services providers to ensure continuity of care for inmates or offenders who are receiving mental health services in an institution and are scheduled for release within six months. The release of records under this division is limited to records regarding an inmate's or offender's medication history, physical health status and history, summary of course of treatment, summary of treatment needs, and a discharge summary, if any; (14) That records and reports relating to a person who has been deceased for fifty years or more are no longer considered confidential. (B) Before records are disclosed pursuant to divisions (A)(3), (6), and (9) of this section, the custodian of the records shall attempt to obtain the patient's consent for the disclosure. No person shall reveal the contents of a medical record of a patient except as authorized by law. (C) The managing officer of a hospital who releases necessary medical information under division (A)(3) of this section to allow an insurance carrier or other third party payor to comply with section 5121.43 of the Revised Code shall neither be subject to criminal nor civil liability. Sec. 5122.311. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, if, on or after April 8, 2004, an individual is found by a probate court or criminal court to be a person with a mental illness subject to court order or becomes an involuntary patient other than one who is a patient only for purposes of observation, the probate judge who made the adjudication or the chief clinical officer of the hospital, community mental health services provider, or facility in which the person is an involuntary patient shall notify the office of the attorney general, on the form described in division (C) of this section, of the identity of the individual. The notification shall be transmitted by the judge or the chief clinical officer not later than seven days after the adjudication or commitment. (B) The office of the attorney general shall compile and maintain the notices it receives under division (A) of this section and the notices shall be used for the purpose of conducting incompetency records checks pursuant to section 311.41 of the Revised Code. The notices and the information they contain are confidential, except as provided in this division, and are not public records. (C) The attorney general, by rule adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall prescribe and make available to all probate judges of probate courts and criminal courts and all chief clinical officers a form to be used by them for the purpose of making the notifications required by division (A) of this section. Sec. 5122.35. (A) In a case in which the jurisdiction of a court has not been specifically given or the procedure provided for, the court in the county in which a person alleged to be mentally ill is found shall have full, complete, and general jurisdiction to make disposition of such person in accordance with the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code. (B) When an affidavit is filed in the probate court or criminal court as provided in section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, and the person alleged to be mentally ill is detained in a hospital located in another county, the probate court or criminal court of the county in which such hospital is located shall, upon the request of the court receiving the affidavit, hold a hearing and make disposition of such person in accordance with Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.36. If the legal residence of a person with a mental illness is in another county of the state, the necessary expense of the person's return is a proper charge against the county of legal residence. If an adjudication and order of hospitalization by the probate court or criminal court of the county of temporary residence are required, the regular probate court or criminal court fees and expenses incident to the order of hospitalization under this chapter and any other expense incurred on the person's behalf shall be charged to and paid by the county of the person's legal residence upon the approval and certification of the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county of the person's legal residence. The ordering court shall send to the probate court or the criminal court of the person's county of legal residence a certified copy of the commitment order from the ordering court. The receiving court shall enter and record the commitment order. The certified commitment order is prima facie evidence of the residence of the person. When the residence of the person cannot be established as represented by the ordering court, the matter of residence shall be referred to the department of behavioral health for investigation and determination. Sec. 5122.38. Each individual now or formerly hospitalized pursuant to this chapter or former Chapter 5123. of the Revised Code, is entitled to an adjudication of competency or incompetency or termination of guardianship upon written request by any such individual, histhe individual's guardian, or the chief clinical officer to the probate court or criminal court. The court, on its own motion, may initiate such a hearing. Upon filing of such application, or on the probate court's or criminal court's own motion, notice of the purpose, time, and place of the hearing shall be given to the person upon whose affidavit such adjudication was made, to the guardian of the applicant, and to histhe person's spouse at histhe spouse's residence, if such address is known. Upon hearing, if it is proven that such applicant is competent, the probate court or criminal court shall so find and enter the finding on its journal. The adjudicating court shall send a transcript of the adjudication to the county of the patient's residence. Sec. 5122.41. The probate court or criminal court, upon making an order hospitalizing a person under this chapter, shall immediately transmit to the chief clinical officer of the hospital, copies, under histhe court's official seal, of court papers in the case, including the certificate of the medical witnesses and of histhe court's findings in the case. Upon hospitalization, the chief clinical officer of the hospital to which the patient is admitted shall take possession of all money and other valuables that may be upon the person of the patient, and shall within ten days file a list thereof with the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county of which the patient is a resident. If the amount of money is fifty dollars or less it shall be retained and expended by the chief clinical officer of the hospital for the benefit of the patient. Unless a guardian of the estate of the patient has already been appointed, the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court may, upon histhe judge's own motion and without notice, appoint a special guardian of the estate of the patient. Any special guardian, before being appointed, shall file a bond approved by the probate judge in the same amount as is required by section 2109.04 of the Revised Code. A special guardian as provided for in this section, and while acting as such, shall be governed by all laws applicable to guardians of the estates of either minors or incompetents. The special guardian shall be allowed such compensation for histhe special guardian's services as the probate court or criminal court thinks reasonable, provided hethe special guardian forthwith performs all the duties incumbent upon himthe special guardian. Sec. 5122.43. (A) Costs, fees, and expenses of all proceedings held under this chapter shall be paid as follows: (1) To police and health officers, other than sheriffs or their deputies, the same fees allowed to constables, to be paid upon the approval of the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court; (2) To sheriffs or their deputies, the same fees allowed for similar services in the court of common pleas, county court, or municipal court; (3) To physicians or licensed clinical psychologists acting as expert witnesses and to other expert witnesses designated by the probate court or criminal court, an amount determined by the probate court or criminal court; (4) To other witnesses, the same fees and mileage as for attendance at the court of common pleas, county court, or municipal court, to be paid upon the approval of the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court; (5) To a person, other than the sheriff or the sheriff's deputies, for taking a person with a mental illness to a hospital or removing a person with a mental illness from a hospital, the actual necessary expenses incurred, specifically itemized, and approved by the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court; (6) To assistants who convey persons with a mental illness to the hospital when authorized by the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court, a fee set by the probate court or criminal court, provided the assistants are not drawing a salary from the state or any political subdivision of the state, and their actual necessary expenses incurred, provided that the expenses are specifically itemized and approved by the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court; (7) To an attorney appointed by the probate division for an indigent who allegedly is a person with a mental illness pursuant to any section of this chapter or a person experiencing alcohol and other drug abuse and who may be ordered under sections 5119.91 to 5119.98 of the Revised Code to undergo treatment, the fees that are determined by the probate division. When those indigent persons are before the probate court or criminal court, all filing and recording fees shall be waived. (8) To a referee who is appointed to conduct proceedings under this chapter that involve a respondent whose domicile is or, before the respondent's hospitalization, was not the county in which the proceedings are held, compensation as fixed by the probate division court or criminal court, but not more than the compensation paid for similar proceedings for respondents whose domicile is in the county in which the proceedings are held; (9) To a court reporter appointed to make a transcript of proceedings under this chapter, the compensation and fees allowed in other cases under section 2101.08 of the Revised Code. (B) A county shall pay for the costs, fees, and expenses described in division (A) of this section with money appropriated pursuant to section 2101.11 of the Revised Code. A county may seek reimbursement from the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services by submitting a request and certification by the county auditor of the costs, fees, and expenses to the department within two months of the date the costs, fees, and expenses are incurred by the county. Each fiscal year, based on past allocations, historical utilization, and other factors the department considers appropriate, the department shall allocate for each county an amount for reimbursements under this section. A county's allocation may be zero. The department shall set aside an amount in addition to the allocations to cover court costs associated with proceedings held under this chapter for counties that received an allocation of zero but that incurred expenditures authorized by the department. The total of all the allocations plus the additional amount set aside shall equal the amount appropriated for the fiscal year to the department specifically for the purposes of this section. On receipt, the department shall review each request for reimbursement and prepare a voucher for the amount of the costs, fees, and expenses incurred by the county, provided that the total amount of money paid to all counties in each fiscal year shall not exceed the total amount of moneys specifically appropriated to the department for these purposes. The department's total reimbursement to each county shall be the lesser of the full amount requested or either the amount allocated for the county under this division, or, for counties that received an allocation of zero, the amount approved by the department. In addition, the department shall distribute any surplus remaining from the money appropriated for the fiscal year to the department for the purposes of this section as follows to counties whose full requests exceed their allocations: (1) If the surplus is sufficient to reimburse such counties the full amount of their requests, each such county shall receive the full amount of its request; (2) If the surplus is insufficient, each such county shall receive a percentage of the surplus determined by dividing the difference between the county's full request and its allocation by the difference between the total of the full requests of all such counties and the total of the amounts allocated for all such counties. The department may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement the payment of costs, fees, and expenses under this section. Sec. 5123.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Chief medical officer" means the licensed physician appointed by the managing officer of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities with the approval of the director of developmental disabilities to provide medical treatment for residents of the institution. (B) "Chief program director" means a person with special training and experience in the diagnosis and management of persons with developmental disabilities, certified according to division (C) of this section in at least one of the designated fields, and appointed by the managing officer of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities with the approval of the director to provide habilitation and care for residents of the institution. (C) "Comprehensive evaluation" means a study, including a sequence of observations and examinations, of a person leading to conclusions and recommendations formulated jointly, with dissenting opinions if any, by a group of persons with special training and experience in the diagnosis and management of persons with developmental disabilities, which group shall include individuals who are professionally qualified in the fields of medicine, psychology, and social work, together with such other specialists as the individual case may require. (D) "Education" means the process of formal training and instruction to facilitate the intellectual and emotional development of residents. (E) "Habilitation" means the process by which the staff of the institution assists the resident in acquiring and maintaining those life skills that enable the resident to cope more effectively with the demands of the resident's own person and of the resident's environment and in raising the level of the resident's physical, mental, social, and vocational efficiency. Habilitation includes but is not limited to programs of formal, structured education and training. (F) "Health officer" means any public health physician, public health nurse, or other person authorized or designated by a city or general health district. (G) "Home and community-based services" means medicaid-funded home and community-based services specified in division (A)(1) of section 5166.20 of the Revised Code provided under the medicaid waiver components the department of developmental disabilities administers pursuant to section 5166.21 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in section 5123.0412 of the Revised Code, home and community-based services provided under the medicaid waiver component known as the transitions developmental disabilities waiver are to be considered to be home and community-based services for the purposes of this chapter, and Chapters 5124. and 5126. of the Revised Code, only to the extent, if any, provided by the contract required by section 5166.21 of the Revised Code regarding the waiver. (H) "ICF/IID" and "ICF/IID services" have the same meanings as in section 5124.01 of the Revised Code. (I) "Indigent person" means a person who is unable, without substantial financial hardship, to provide for the payment of an attorney and for other necessary expenses of legal representation, including expert testimony. (J) "Institution" means a public or private facility, or a part of a public or private facility, that is licensed by the appropriate state department and is equipped to provide residential habilitation, care, and treatment for persons with intellectual disabilities. (K) "Licensed physician" means a person who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code authorizing the person to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while in the performance of the officer's official duties. (L) "Managing officer" means a person who is appointed by the director of developmental disabilities to be in executive control of an institution under the jurisdiction of the department of developmental disabilities. (M) "Medicaid case management services" means case management services provided to an individual with a developmental disability that the state medicaid plan requires. (N) "Intellectual disability" means a disability characterized by having significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficiencies in adaptive behavior, manifested during the developmental period. (O) "Person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order" means a person eighteen years of age or older with at least a moderate level of intellectual disability and in relation to whom, because of the person's disability, either of the following conditions exists: (1) The person represents a very substantial risk of physical impairment or injury to self as manifested by evidence that the person is unable to provide for and is not providing for the person's most basic physical needs and that provision for those needs is not available in the community; (2) The person needs and is susceptible to significant habilitation in an institution. (P) "Moderate level of intellectual disability" means the condition in which a person, following a comprehensive evaluation, is found to have at least moderate deficits in overall intellectual functioning, as indicated by a full-scale intelligence quotient test score of fifty-five or below, and at least moderate deficits in adaptive behavior, as determined in accordance with the criteria established in the fifth edition of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders published by the American psychiatric association. (Q) "Developmental disability" means a severe, chronic disability that is characterized by all of the following: (1) It is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or a combination of mental and physical impairments, other than a mental or physical impairment solely caused by mental illness, as defined in division (A) of section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (2) It is manifested before age twenty-two. (3) It is likely to continue indefinitely. (4) It results in one of the following: (a) In the case of a person under three years of age, at least one developmental delay, as defined in rules adopted under section 5123.011 of the Revised Code, or a diagnosed physical or mental condition that has a high probability of resulting in a developmental delay, as defined in those rules; (b) In the case of a person at least three years of age but under six years of age, at least two developmental delays, as defined in rules adopted under section 5123.011 of the Revised Code; (c) In the case of a person six years of age or older, a substantial functional limitation in at least three of the following areas of major life activity, as appropriate for the person's age: self-care, receptive and expressive language, learning, mobility, self-direction, capacity for independent living, and, if the person is at least sixteen years of age, capacity for economic self-sufficiency. (5) It causes the person to need a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or other type of care, treatment, or provision of services for an extended period of time that is individually planned and coordinated for the person. "Developmental disability" includes intellectual disability. (R) "State institution" means an institution that is tax-supported and under the jurisdiction of the department of developmental disabilities. (S) "Residence" and "legal residence" have the same meaning as "legal settlement," which is acquired by residing in Ohio for a period of one year without receiving general assistance prior to July 17, 1995, under former Chapter 5113. of the Revised Code, without receiving financial assistance prior to December 31, 2017, under former Chapter 5115. of the Revised Code, or assistance from a private agency that maintains records of assistance given. A person having a legal settlement in the state shall be considered as having legal settlement in the assistance area in which the person resides. No adult person coming into this state and having a spouse or minor children residing in another state shall obtain a legal settlement in this state as long as the spouse or minor children are receiving public assistance, care, or support at the expense of the other state or its subdivisions. For the purpose of determining the legal settlement of a person who is living in a public or private institution or in a home subject to licensing by the department of job and family services, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, or the department of developmental disabilities, the residence of the person shall be considered as though the person were residing in the county in which the person was living prior to the person's entrance into the institution or home. Settlement once acquired shall continue until a person has been continuously absent from Ohio for a period of one year or has acquired a legal residence in another state. A woman who marries a man with legal settlement in any county immediately acquires the settlement of her husband. The legal settlement of a minor is that of the parents, surviving parent, sole parent, parent who is designated the residential parent and legal custodian by a court, other adult having permanent custody awarded by a court, or guardian of the person of the minor, provided that: (1) A minor female who marries shall be considered to have the legal settlement of her husband and, in the case of death of her husband or divorce, she shall not thereby lose her legal settlement obtained by the marriage. (2) A minor male who marries, establishes a home, and who has resided in this state for one year without receiving general assistance prior to July 17, 1995, under former Chapter 5113. of the Revised Code or assistance from a private agency that maintains records of assistance given shall be considered to have obtained a legal settlement in this state. (3) The legal settlement of a child under eighteen years of age who is in the care or custody of a public or private child caring agency shall not change if the legal settlement of the parent changes until after the child has been in the home of the parent for a period of one year. No person, adult or minor, may establish a legal settlement in this state for the purpose of gaining admission to any state institution. (T)(1) "Resident" means, subject to division (T)(2) of this section, a person who is admitted either voluntarily or involuntarily to an institution or other facility pursuant to section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code subsequent to a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetence to stand trial or under this chapter who is under observation or receiving habilitation and care in an institution. (2) "Resident" does not include a person admitted to an institution or other facility under section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code to the extent that the reference in this chapter to resident, or the context in which the reference occurs, is in conflict with any provision of sections 2945.37 to 2945.402 of the Revised Code. (U) "Respondent" means the person whose detention, commitment, or continued commitment is being sought in any proceeding under this chapter. (V) "Working day" and "court day" mean Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, and Friday, except when such day is a legal holiday. (W) "Prosecutor" means the prosecuting attorney, village solicitor, city director of law, or similar chief legal officer who prosecuted a criminal case in which a person was found not guilty by reason of insanity, who would have had the authority to prosecute a criminal case against a person if the person had not been found incompetent to stand trial, or who prosecuted a case in which a person was found guilty. (X) "Court""Probate court" means the probate division of the court of common pleas. (Y) "Supported living" and "residential services" have the same meanings as in section 5126.01 of the Revised Code. (Z) "Criminal court" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5123.21. The director of developmental disabilities may transfer or authorize the transfer of an involuntary resident or a consenting voluntary resident from one public institution to another or to an institution other than a public institution or other facility, if the director determines that it would be consistent with the habilitation needs of the resident to do so. Before an involuntary resident may be transferred to a more restrictive setting, the managing officer of the institution shall file a motion with the probate court or criminal court requesting the court to amend its order of placement issued under section 5123.76 of the Revised Code. At the resident's request, the court shall hold a hearing on the motion at which the resident has the same rights as at a full hearing under section 5123.76 of the Revised Code. Whenever a resident is transferred, the director shall give written notice of the transfer to the resident's legal guardian, parents, spouse, and counsel, or, if none is known, to the resident's nearest known relative or friend. If the resident is a minor, the director before making such a transfer shall make a minute of the order for the transfer and the reason for it upon its record and shall send a certified copy at least seven days prior to the transfer to the person shown by its record to have had the care or custody of the minor immediately prior to the minor's commitment. Whenever a consenting voluntary resident is transferred, the notification shall be given only at the resident's request. The managing officer shall advise a voluntary resident who is being transferred that the patient may decide if such a notification shall be given. In all such transfers, due consideration shall be given to the relationship of the resident to the resident's family, legal guardian, or friends, so as to maintain relationships and encourage visits beneficial to the resident. Sec. 5123.39. If not otherwise furnished, the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court shall see that each patient hospitalized under section 5123.76 of the Revised Code is properly attired for transportation, and, in addition, the institution shall be furnished a complete change of clothing for such patient, which shall be paid for on the certificate of the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court and the order of the county auditor from the county treasury. Such clothing shall be new or as good as new. Sec. 5123.57. No guardianship or trusteeship appointment shall be made under sections 5123.55 to 5123.59 of the Revised Code and no person shall be accepted for service by a protector under those sections unless a comprehensive evaluation has been made in a clinic or other facility approved by the department of developmental disabilities. The evaluation shall include a medical, psychological, social, and educational evaluation, and a copy of the evaluation shall be filed with the department. Any agency that is appointed as a guardian, trustee, or conservator under sections 5123.55 to 5123.59 of the Revised Code or accepted as a protector under those sections shall provide for a review at least once each year in writing of the physical, mental, and social condition of each person with a developmental disability for whom it is acting as guardian, trustee, or protector. An agency providing protective services under contract with the department shall file these reports with the department of developmental disabilities. Any record of the department or agency pertaining to a person with a developmental disability shall not be a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Information contained in those records shall not be disclosed publicly in such a manner as to identify individuals, but may be made available to persons approved by the director of developmental disabilities or the probate court. Sec. 5123.58. An agency providing protective services under contract with the department of developmental disabilities may be nominated under any of the following conditions as guardian, trustee, protector, conservator, or as trustee and protector of a person with a developmental disability: (A) The person who needs or believes the person needs protective service may make application in writing. (B) Any interested person may make application in writing on behalf of a person with a developmental disability. (C) A parent may name the department or agency as guardian or successor guardian in a will. (D) A parent may name the department or agency as guardian, trustee, or protector, to assume such duties during the parent's lifetime. If the results of the comprehensive evaluation required under section 5123.57 of the Revised Code indicate that the person named in the nomination is in need of protective services, the agency or service either shall reject or accept the nomination as guardian, trustee, or conservator, subject to appointment by the probate court, or reject or accept the nomination as protector, or trustee and protector. At the time the nomination is accepted or when an appointment is made by the probate court, the person with a developmental disability and any person who made application for service on behalf of the person with a developmental disability under this section shall be informed by the agency, service, or probate court of the procedure for terminating the appointment or service. The agency or service shall cease to provide protective service as a protector pursuant to nomination under division (A), (B), or (D) of this section when a written request for termination is received by the agency from or on behalf of the person with a developmental disability. If the agency or service believes the person to be in need of protective service, the agency or service may file an application for guardianship, trusteeship, or protectorship with the probate court. Termination of any court appointment as guardian, trustee, or protector shall be by order of the probate court. Sec. 5123.61. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Law enforcement agency" means the state highway patrol, the police department of a municipal corporation, or a county sheriff. (2) "Abuse" has the same meaning as in section 5123.50 of the Revised Code, except that it includes a misappropriation, as defined in that section. (3) "Neglect" has the same meaning as in section 5123.50 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of developmental disabilities shall establish a registry office for the purpose of maintaining reports of abuse, neglect, and other major unusual incidents made to the department under this section and reports received from county boards of developmental disabilities under section 5126.31 of the Revised Code. The department shall establish committees to review reports of abuse, neglect, and other major unusual incidents. (C)(1) Any person listed in division (C)(2) of this section, having reason to believe that an individual with a developmental disability has suffered or faces a substantial risk of suffering any wound, injury, disability, or condition of such a nature as to reasonably indicate abuse or neglect of that individual, shall immediately report or cause reports to be made of such information to the entity specified in this division. Except as provided in section 5120.173 of the Revised Code or as otherwise provided in this division, the person making the report shall make it to a law enforcement agency or to the county board of developmental disabilities. If the report concerns a resident of a facility operated by the department of developmental disabilities the report shall be made either to a law enforcement agency or to the department. If the report concerns any act or omission of an employee of a county board of developmental disabilities, the report immediately shall be made to the department and to the county board. (2) All of the following persons are required to make a report under division (C)(1) of this section: (a) Any physician, including a hospital intern or resident, any dentist, podiatrist, chiropractor, practitioner of a limited branch of medicine as specified in section 4731.15 of the Revised Code, hospital administrator or employee of a hospital, nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code, employee of an outpatient health facility as defined in section 5101.60 of the Revised Code, employee of a home health agency, employee of a residential facility licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code that provides accommodations, supervision, and personal care services for three to sixteen unrelated adults, or employee of a community mental health facility; (b) Any school teacher or school authority, licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed professional counselor, independent social worker, social worker, independent marriage and family therapist, marriage and family therapist, psychologist, attorney, peace officer, coroner, or residents' rights advocate as defined in section 3721.10 of the Revised Code; (c) A superintendent, board member, or employee of a county board of developmental disabilities; an administrator, board member, or employee of a residential facility licensed under section 5123.19 of the Revised Code; an administrator, board member, or employee of any other public or private provider of services to an individual with a developmental disability, or any developmental disabilities employee, as defined in section 5123.50 of the Revised Code; (d) A member of a citizen's advisory council established at an institution or branch institution of the department of developmental disabilities under section 5123.092 of the Revised Code; (e) A member of the clergy who is employed in a position that includes providing specialized services to an individual with a developmental disability, while acting in an official or professional capacity in that position, or a person who is employed in a position that includes providing specialized services to an individual with a developmental disability and who, while acting in an official or professional capacity, renders spiritual treatment through prayer in accordance with the tenets of an organized religion. (3)(a) The reporting requirements of this division do not apply to employees of the Ohio protection and advocacy system. (b) An attorney or physician is not required to make a report pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section concerning any communication the attorney or physician receives from a client or patient in an attorney-client or physician-patient relationship, if, in accordance with division (A) or (B) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code, the attorney or physician could not testify with respect to that communication in a civil or criminal proceeding, except that the client or patient is deemed to have waived any testimonial privilege under division (A) or (B) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code with respect to that communication and the attorney or physician shall make a report pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, if both of the following apply: (i) The client or patient, at the time of the communication, is an individual with a developmental disability. (ii) The attorney or physician knows or suspects, as a result of the communication or any observations made during that communication, that the client or patient has suffered or faces a substantial risk of suffering any wound, injury, disability, or condition of a nature that reasonably indicates abuse or neglect of the client or patient. (4) Any person who fails to make a report required under division (C) of this section and who is a developmental disabilities employee, as defined in section 5123.50 of the Revised Code, shall be eligible to be included in the registry regarding misappropriation, abuse, neglect, or other specified misconduct by developmental disabilities employees established under section 5123.52 of the Revised Code. (D) The reports required under division (C) of this section shall be made forthwith by telephone or in person and shall be followed by a written report. The reports shall contain the following: (1) The names and addresses of the individual with a developmental disability and the individual's custodian, if known; (2) The age of the individual with a developmental disability; (3) Any other information that would assist in the investigation of the report. (E) When a physician performing services as a member of the staff of a hospital or similar institution has reason to believe that an individual with a developmental disability has suffered injury, abuse, or physical neglect, the physician shall notify the person in charge of the institution or that person's designated delegate, who shall make the necessary reports. (F) Any person having reasonable cause to believe that an individual with a developmental disability has suffered or faces a substantial risk of suffering abuse or neglect may report or cause a report to be made of that belief to the entity specified in this division. Except as provided in section 5120.173 of the Revised Code or as otherwise provided in this division, the person making the report shall make it to a law enforcement agency or the county board of developmental disabilities. If the individual is a resident of a facility operated by the department of developmental disabilities, the report shall be made to a law enforcement agency or to the department. If the report concerns any act or omission of an employee of a county board of developmental disabilities, the report immediately shall be made to the department and to the county board. (G)(1) Upon the receipt of a report concerning the possible abuse or neglect of an individual with a developmental disability, the law enforcement agency shall inform the county board of developmental disabilities or, if the individual is a resident of a facility operated by the department of developmental disabilities, the department. (2) On receipt of a report under this section that includes an allegation of action or inaction that may constitute a crime under federal law or the law of this state, the department of developmental disabilities shall notify the law enforcement agency. (3) When a county board of developmental disabilities receives a report under this section that includes an allegation of action or inaction that may constitute a crime under federal law or the law of this state, the superintendent of the board or an individual the superintendent designates under division (H) of this section shall notify the law enforcement agency. The superintendent or individual shall notify the department of developmental disabilities when it receives any report under this section. (4) When a county board of developmental disabilities receives a report under this section and believes that the degree of risk to the person is such that the report is an emergency, the superintendent of the board or an employee of the board the superintendent designates shall attempt a face-to-face contact with the individual with a developmental disability who allegedly is the victim within one hour of the board's receipt of the report. (H) The superintendent of the board may designate an individual to be responsible for notifying the law enforcement agency and the department when the county board receives a report under this section. (I) An adult with a developmental disability about whom a report is made may be removed from the adult's place of residence only by law enforcement officers who consider that the adult's immediate removal is essential to protect the adult from further injury or abuse or in accordance with the order of a probate court made pursuant to section 5126.33 of the Revised Code. (J) A law enforcement agency shall investigate each report of abuse or neglect it receives under this section. In addition, the department, in cooperation with law enforcement officials, shall investigate each report regarding a resident of a facility operated by the department to determine the circumstances surrounding the injury, the cause of the injury, and the person responsible. The investigation shall be in accordance with the memorandum of understanding prepared under section 5126.058 of the Revised Code. The department shall determine, with the registry office which shall be maintained by the department, whether prior reports have been made concerning an adult with a developmental disability or other principals in the case. If the department finds that the report involves action or inaction that may constitute a crime under federal law or the law of this state, it shall submit a report of its investigation, in writing, to the law enforcement agency. If the individual with a developmental disability is an adult, with the consent of the adult, the department shall provide such protective services as are necessary to protect the adult. The law enforcement agency shall make a written report of its findings to the department. If the individual with a developmental disability is an adult and is not a resident of a facility operated by the department, the county board of developmental disabilities shall review the report of abuse or neglect in accordance with sections 5126.30 to 5126.33 of the Revised Code and the law enforcement agency shall make the written report of its findings to the county board. (K) Any person or any hospital, institution, school, health department, or agency participating in the making of reports pursuant to this section, any person participating as a witness in an administrative or judicial proceeding resulting from the reports, or any person or governmental entity that discharges responsibilities under sections 5126.31 to 5126.33 of the Revised Code shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of such actions except liability for perjury, unless the person or governmental entity has acted in bad faith or with malicious purpose. (L) No employer or any person with the authority to do so shall discharge, demote, transfer, prepare a negative work performance evaluation, reduce pay or benefits, terminate work privileges, or take any other action detrimental to an employee or retaliate against an employee as a result of the employee's having made a report under this section. This division does not preclude an employer or person with authority from taking action with regard to an employee who has made a report under this section if there is another reasonable basis for the action. (M) Reports made under this section are not public records as defined in section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Information contained in the reports on request shall be made available to the individual who is the subject of the report, to the individual's legal counsel, and to agencies authorized to receive information in the report by the department or by a county board of developmental disabilities. (N) Notwithstanding section 4731.22 of the Revised Code, the physician-patient privilege shall not be a ground for excluding evidence regarding the injuries or physical neglect of an individual with a developmental disability or the cause thereof in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report submitted pursuant to this section. Sec. 5123.70. (A) A resident admitted pursuant to section 5123.69 of the Revised Code who requests histhe resident's own release or whose release is requested in writing by histhe resident's counsel, legal guardian, parent, spouse, or adult next of kin shall be released forthwith except that: (1) If a resident was admitted on histhe resident's own application and the request for release is made by a person other than the resident, release may be made conditional upon the agreement of the resident thereto if histhe resident's continued institutionalization is supported by histhe resident's most recent comprehensive evaluation; (2) If, within three court days from the receipt of the request for release, the managing officer files an affidavit or causes an affidavit to be filed under section 5123.71 of the Revised Code with the probate division of the court of common pleas of the county where the resident has his residence or where he is institutionalized or criminal court, release may be postponed until a hearing can be held pursuant to section 5123.76 of the Revised Code. In such case, the request for release shall substitute for the request for a probable cause hearing under section 5123.75 of the Revised Code. A telephone communication to the probate division from the managing officer of the institution or histhe managing officer's designee indicating that the required affidavit has been mailed by certified mail shall be sufficient compliance with division (A)(2) of this section. (B) Judicial proceedings for institutionalization shall not be commenced with respect to a voluntary resident except pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section. (C) Sections 5121.01 to 5121.10 of the Revised Code shall apply to the persons received in a public institution on a voluntary application. (D) The managing officer shall inform residents, parents, guardians, and custodians of the right to release as provided in this section and shall assist residents in making and presenting requests for release. Sec. 5123.71. (A)(1) Proceedings for the involuntary institutionalization of a person pursuant to sections 5123.71 to 5123.76 of the Revised Code shall be commenced by the filing of an affidavit with the probate division of the court of common pleas of the county where the person resides or where the person is institutionalized, in the manner and form prescribed by the department of developmental disabilities. The affidavit shall be filed in either of the following manners: In a probate court of the county where the person resides or where the person is institutionalized either on information or actual knowledge, whichever is determined to be proper by the court. The affidavit may be filed in a probate court only by a person who has custody of the individual as a parent, guardian, or service provider or by a person acting on behalf of the department or a county board of developmental disabilities. This section does not apply regarding the institutionalization of a person pursuant to section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. In a criminal court by the trial court or prosecutor, pursuant to division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code. The affidavit shall contain an allegation setting forth the specific category or categories under division (O) of section 5123.01 of the Revised Code upon which the commencement of proceedings is based and a statement of the factual ground for the belief that the person is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the affidavit shall be accompanied by both of the following: (a) A comprehensive evaluation report prepared by the person's evaluation team that includes a statement by the members of the team certifying that they have performed a comprehensive evaluation of the person and that they are of the opinion that the person is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order; (b) An assessment report prepared by the county board of developmental disabilities under section 5123.711 of the Revised Code specifying that the individual is in need of services on an emergency or priority basis. (2) In lieu of the comprehensive evaluation report, the affidavit may be accompanied by a written and sworn statement that the person or the guardian of a person adjudicated incompetent has refused to allow a comprehensive evaluation and county board assessment and assessment reports. Immediately after accepting an affidavit that is not accompanied by the reports of a comprehensive evaluation and county board assessment, the probate court or criminal court shall cause a comprehensive evaluation and county board assessment of the person named in the affidavit to be performed. The evaluation shall be conducted in the least restrictive environment possible and the assessment shall be conducted in the same manner as assessments conducted under section 5123.711 of the Revised Code. The evaluation and assessment must be completed before a probable cause hearing or full hearing may be held under section 5123.75 or 5123.76 of the Revised Code. A written report of the evaluation team's findings and the county board's assessment shall be filed with the probate court or criminal court. The reports shall, consistent with the rules of evidence, be accepted as probative evidence in any proceeding under section 5123.75 or 5123.76 of the Revised Code. If the counsel for the person who is evaluated or assessed is known, the court shall send to the counsel a copy of the reports as soon as possible after they are filed and prior to any proceedings under section 5123.75 or 5123.76 of the Revised Code. (B) Any person who is involuntarily detained in an institution or otherwise is in custody under this chapter shall be informed of the right to do the following: (1) Immediately make a reasonable number of telephone calls or use other reasonable means to contact an attorney, a physician, or both, to contact any other person or persons to secure representation by counsel, or to obtain medical assistance, and be provided assistance in making calls if the assistance is needed and requested; (2) Retain counsel and have independent expert evaluation and, if the person is an indigent person, be represented by court-appointed counsel and have independent expert evaluation at court the probate court's or criminal court's expense; (3) Upon request, have a hearing to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the person is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. (C) No person who is being treated by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing may be ordered detained or involuntarily committed unless the probate court or criminal court has determined that the person represents a very substantial risk of self-impairment, self-injury, or impairment or injury to others. Sec. 5123.73. (A) After receipt of the affidavit required by section 5123.71 of the Revised Code, the probate court or criminal court shall cause written notice, by mail or otherwise, of any hearing the court directs, to be given to all of the following persons: (1) The respondent; (2) The respondent's legal guardian, if any; (3) The respondent's spouse, if address is known; (4) The person filing the affidavit; (5) Any one person designated by the respondent, except that if the respondent does not make a selection, the notice shall be sent to the adult next of kin other than the person who filed the affidavit, if that person's address is known to the probate court or criminal court; (6) The respondent's counsel; (7) The director of developmental disabilities or the director's designee under section 5123.72 of the Revised Code. (B) All persons entitled to notice under this section may waive that notice. (C) A copy of the affidavit and of any temporary order shall be served with a notice under this section. Sec. 5123.74. (A) On receipt of an affidavit under section 5123.71 of the Revised Code, the probate division of the court of common pleas or criminal court may, if it has probable cause to believe that the person named in the affidavit is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order and that emergency institutionalization is required, do any of the following: (1) Issue a temporary order of detention ordering any health or police officer or sheriff to take into custody and transport such person to an institution or other place as designated in section 5123.77 of the Revised Code; (2) Order the county board of developmental disabilities to provide services to the individual in the community if the board's assessment of the individual conducted under section 5123.711 of the Revised Code identifies that resources are available to meet the individual's needs in an appropriate manner within the community as an alternative to institutionalization; (3) Set the matter for further hearing. (B) A managing officer of a nonpublic institution may, and the managing officer of a public institution shall, receive for observation, diagnosis, habilitation, and care any person whose admission is ordered pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section. The alternatives to institutionalization that may be ordered under division (A)(2) of this section are limited to those that are necessary to remediate the emergency condition; necessary for the person's health, safety or welfare; and necessary for the protection of society, if applicable. (C) A person detained under this section may be observed and habilitated until the probable cause hearing provided for in section 5123.75 of the Revised Code. If no probable cause hearing is requested or held, the person may be evaluated and shall be provided with habilitative services until the full hearing is held pursuant to section 5123.76 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5123.75. A respondent who is involuntarily placed in an institution or other place as designated in section 5123.77 of the Revised Code or with respect to whom proceedings have been instituted under section 5123.71 of the Revised Code shall, on request of the respondent, the respondent's guardian, or the respondent's counsel, or upon the probate court's or criminal court's own motion, be afforded a hearing to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the respondent is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. (A) The probable cause hearing shall be conducted within two court days from the day on which the request is made. Failure to conduct the probable cause hearing within this time shall effect an immediate discharge of the respondent. If the proceedings are not reinstituted within thirty days, records of the proceedings shall be expunged. (B) The respondent shall be informed that the respondent may retain counsel and have independent expert evaluation and, if the respondent is an indigent person, be represented by court appointed counsel and have independent expert evaluation at court the probate court's or criminal court's expense. (C) The probable cause hearing shall be conducted in a manner consistent with the procedures set forth in division (A) of section 5123.76 of the Revised Code, except divisions (A)(10) and (14) of that section, and the designee of the director of developmental disabilities under section 5123.72 of the Revised Code shall present evidence for the state. (D) If the probate court or criminal court does not find probable cause to believe that the respondent is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, it shall order immediate release of the respondent and dismiss and expunge all record of the proceedings under this chapter. (E) On motion of the respondent or the respondent's counsel and for good cause shown, the probate court or criminal court may order a continuance of the hearing. (F) If the probate court or criminal court finds probable cause to believe that the respondent is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, the court may issue an interim order of placement and, where proceedings under section 5123.71 of the Revised Code have been instituted, shall order a full hearing as provided in section 5123.76 of the Revised Code to be held on the question of whether the respondent is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. Unless specifically waived by the respondent or the respondent's counsel, the court shall schedule said hearing to be held as soon as possible within ten days from the probable cause hearing. A waiver of such full hearing at this point shall not preclude the respondent from asserting the respondent's right to such hearing under section 5123.76 of the Revised Code at any time prior to the mandatory hearing provided in division (H) of section 5123.76 of the Revised Code. In any case, if the respondent has waived the right to the full hearing, a mandatory hearing shall be held under division (H) of section 5123.76 of the Revised Code between the ninetieth and the one hundredth day after the original involuntary detention of the person unless the respondent has been discharged. (G) Whenever possible, the probable cause hearing shall be held before the respondent is taken into custody. Sec. 5123.76. (A) The full hearing shall be conducted in a manner consistent with the procedures outlined in this chapter and with due process of law. The hearing shall be held by a judge of the probate division court or, upon transfer by the judge of the probate division court, by another judge of the court of common pleas, a judge of the criminal court, or a referee designated by the judge of the probate division court or criminal court. Any referee designated by the judge of the probate division court or criminal court must be an attorney. (1) The following shall be made available to counsel for the respondent: (a) All relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of the state or prosecutor; (b) All relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of the institution, facility, or program in which the respondent currently is held or in which the respondent has been held pursuant to these proceedings; (c) With the consent of the respondent, all relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of any institution or person other than the state. (2) The respondent has the right to be represented by counsel of the respondent's choice and has the right to attend the hearing except if unusual circumstances of compelling medical necessity exist that render the respondent unable to attend and the respondent has not expressed a desire to attend. (3) If the respondent is not represented by counsel and the probate court or criminal court determines that the conditions specified in division (A)(2) of this section justify the respondent's absence and the right to counsel has not been validly waived, the court shall appoint counsel forthwith to represent the respondent at the hearing, reserving the right to tax costs of appointed counsel to the respondent unless it is shown that the respondent is indigent. If the court appoints counsel, or if the court determines that the evidence relevant to the respondent's absence does not justify the absence, the court shall continue the case. (4) The respondent shall be informed of the right to retain counsel, to have independent expert evaluation, and, if an indigent person, to be represented by court appointed counsel and have expert independent evaluation at court the probate court's or criminal court's expense. (5) The hearing may be closed to the public unless counsel for the respondent requests that the hearing be open to the public. (6) Unless objected to by the respondent, the respondent's counsel, or the designee of the director of developmental disabilities under section 5123.72 of the Revised Code, the probate court or criminal court, for good cause shown, may admit persons having a legitimate interest in the proceedings. (7) The affiant under section 5123.71 of the Revised Code shall be subject to subpoena by either party. (8) The probate court or criminal court shall examine the sufficiency of all documents filed and shall inform the respondent, if present, and the respondent's counsel of the nature of the content of the documents and the reason for which the respondent is being held or for which the respondent's placement is being sought. (9) The probate court or criminal court shall receive only relevant, competent, and material evidence. (10) In accordance with section 5123.72 of the Revised Code, the designee of the director shall present the evidence for the state. In proceedings under this chapter, the attorney general shall present the comprehensive evaluation, assessment, diagnosis, prognosis, record of habilitation and care, if any, and less restrictive habilitation plans, if any. The attorney general does not have a similar presentation responsibility in connection with a person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity and who is the subject of a hearing under section 2945.40 of the Revised Code to determine whether the person is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. (11) The respondent has the right to testify and the respondent or the respondent's counsel has the right to subpoena witnesses and documents and to present and cross-examine witnesses. (12) The respondent shall not be compelled to testify and shall be so advised by the probate court or criminal court. (13) On motion of the respondent or the respondent's counsel for good cause shown, or upon the probate court's or criminal court's own motion, the court may order a continuance of the hearing. (14) To an extent not inconsistent with this chapter, the Rules of Civil Procedure shall be applicable. (B) Unless, upon completion of the hearing, the probate court or criminal court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent named in the affidavit is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, it shall order the respondent's discharge forthwith. (C) If, upon completion of the hearing, the probate court or criminal court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, the court may order the respondent's discharge or order the respondent, for a period not to exceed ninety days, to any of the following: (1) A public institution, provided that commitment of the respondent to the institution will not cause the institution to exceed its licensed capacity determined in accordance with section 5123.19 of the Revised Code and provided that such a placement is indicated by the comprehensive evaluation report filed pursuant to section 5123.71 of the Revised Code; (2) A private institution; (3) A program offered by a county board of developmental disabilities for persons with intellectual disabilities; (4) Receive private habilitation and care; (5) Any other suitable facility, program, or the care of any person consistent with the comprehensive evaluation, assessment, diagnosis, prognosis, and habilitation needs of the respondent. (D) Any order made pursuant to division (C)(2), (4), or (5) of this section shall be conditional upon the receipt by the probate court or criminal court of consent by the facility, program, or person to accept the respondent. (E) In determining the place to which, or the person with whom, the respondent is to be committed, the probate court or criminal court shall consider the comprehensive evaluation, assessment, diagnosis, and projected habilitation plan for the respondent, and shall order the implementation of the least restrictive alternative available and consistent with habilitation goals. (F) If, at any time it is determined by the director of the facility or program to which, or the person to whom, the respondent is committed that the respondent could be equally well habilitated in a less restrictive environment that is available, the following shall occur: (1) The respondent shall be released by the director of the facility or program or by the person forthwith and referred to the probate court or criminal court together with a report of the findings and recommendations of the facility, program, or person. (2) The director of the facility or program or the person shall notify the respondent's counsel and the designee of the director of developmental disabilities. (3) The probate court or criminal court shall dismiss the case or order placement in the less restrictive environment. (G)(1) Except as provided in divisions (G)(2) and (3) of this section, any person who has been committed under this section may apply at any time during the ninety-day period for voluntary admission to an institution under section 5123.69 of the Revised Code. Upon admission of a voluntary resident, the managing officer immediately shall notify the probate court or criminal court, the respondent's counsel, and the designee of the director in writing of that fact by mail or otherwise, and, upon receipt of the notice, the court shall dismiss the case. (2) A person who is found incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity and who is committed pursuant to section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code shall not be voluntarily admitted to an institution pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section until after the termination of the commitment, as described in division (J) of section 2945.401 of the Revised Code. (H) If, at the end of any commitment period, the respondent has not already been discharged or has not requested voluntary admission status, the director of the facility or program, or the person to whose care the respondent has been committed, shall discharge the respondent forthwith, unless at least ten days before the expiration of that period the designee of the director of developmental disabilities or the prosecutor files an application with the probate court or criminal court requesting continued commitment. (1) An application for continued commitment shall include a written report containing a current comprehensive evaluation and assessment, a diagnosis, a prognosis, an account of progress and past habilitation, and a description of alternative habilitation settings and plans, including a habilitation setting that is the least restrictive setting consistent with the need for habilitation. A copy of the application shall be provided to respondent's counsel. The requirements for notice under section 5123.73 of the Revised Code and the provisions of divisions (A) to (E) of this section apply to all hearings on such applications. (2) A hearing on the first application for continued commitment shall be held at the expiration of the first ninety-day period. The hearing shall be mandatory and may not be waived. (3) Subsequent periods of commitment not to exceed one hundred eighty days each may be ordered by the probate court or criminal court if the designee of the director of developmental disabilities files an application for continued commitment, after a hearing is held on the application or without a hearing if no hearing is requested and no hearing required under division (H)(4) of this section is waived. Upon the application of a person involuntarily committed under this section, supported by an affidavit of a licensed physician alleging that the person is no longer a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, the court for good cause shown may hold a full hearing on the person's continued commitment prior to the expiration of any subsequent period of commitment set by the court. (4) A mandatory hearing shall be held at least every two years after the initial commitment. (5) If the probate court or criminal court, after a hearing upon a request to continue commitment, finds that the respondent is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, the court may make an order pursuant to divisions (C), (D), and (E) of this section. (I) Notwithstanding the provisions of division (H) of this section, no person who is found to be a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order pursuant to division (O)(2) of section 5123.01 of the Revised Code shall be held under involuntary commitment for more than five years. (J) The managing officer admitting a person pursuant to a judicial proceeding, within ten working days of the admission, shall make a report of the admission to the department. Sec. 5123.79. (A) Notwithstanding a finding pursuant to section 5123.76 of the Revised Code that a person is a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order, the managing officer of an institution, with the concurrence of the chief program director, shall, except as provided in division (C) of this section, grant a discharge without the consent or the authorization of any court upon a determination that institutionalization no longer is appropriate. Upon the discharge, the managing officer of the institution shall notify the probate division of the court of common pleas or criminal court that made the involuntary commitment. (B) Upon the request of the director of a private institution, program, facility, or person having custody of a resident institutionalized pursuant to section 5123.76 of the Revised Code, or on the order of the probate division of the court of common pleas or criminal court, the resident may be called for a rehearing to determine the advisability of continued institutionalization at a place within the county of resident's residence or the county where the resident is institutionalized as the probate division designates. The hearing shall be held pursuant to section 5123.76 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5123.81. When an involuntarily committed resident of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities is absent without leave, an order shall be issued within five days after the resident's absence requiring the resident to be taken into custody by any health or police officer, or sheriff and transported to the institution from which the resident is absent. The order may be issued by the director of developmental disabilities, the managing officer of the institution from which the resident is absent, or the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county from which the resident was ordered institutionalized or in which he the resident is found. The officer who takes the resident into custody shall immediately notify the issuer of the order. Sec. 5123.811. The managing officer of an institution under the control of the department of developmental disabilities shall immediately report the removal, death, absence without leave, discharge, or trial visit of any resident, or return of an absent without leave or visiting resident to the department, the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county from which such resident was institutionalized, and the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county of the residence of such resident. In case of death, the managing officer shall also notify one or more of the nearest relatives of the deceased resident, if known to the managing officer, by letter, telegram, or telephone. If the place of residence of such relative is unknown to the managing officer, immediately upon receiving notification, the probate judge shall in the speediest manner possible notify such relatives, if known to the probate judge. The managing officer of the institution shall, upon the request of the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county from which such resident was institutionalized or the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court of the county of the residence of such resident, make a report to such judge of the condition of any resident under the care, treatment, custody, or control of such managing officer. Sec. 5123.86. (A) Except as provided in divisions (C), (D), and (E) of this section, the chief medical officer shall provide all information, including expected physical and medical consequences, necessary to enable any resident of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities to give a fully informed, intelligent, and knowing consent if any of the following procedures are proposed: (1) Surgery; (2) Sterilization; (3) Experimental procedures. (B) No resident shall be subjected to sterilization without the resident's informed consent. (C) If a resident is physically or mentally unable to receive the information required for surgery or an experimental procedure under division (A) of this section, or has been adjudicated incompetent, the information may be provided to the resident's natural or court-appointed guardian, including an agency providing guardianship services under contract with the department of developmental disabilities under sections 5123.55 to 5123.59 of the Revised Code. The guardian may give the informed, intelligent, and knowing written consent for surgery or the experimental procedure. If a resident is physically or mentally unable to receive the information required for surgery or an experimental procedure under division (A) of this section and has no guardian, then the information, the recommendation of the chief medical officer, and the concurring judgment of a licensed physician who is not a full-time employee of the state may be provided to the probate court or criminal court in the county in which the institution is located. The court may approve the surgery or experimental procedure. Before approving the surgery or experimental procedure, the court shall notify the Ohio protection and advocacy system created by section 5123.60 of the Revised Code, and shall notify the resident of the resident's rights to consult with counsel, to have counsel appointed by the court if the resident is indigent, and to contest the recommendation of the chief medical officer. (D) If, in the judgment of two licensed physicians, delay in obtaining consent for surgery would create a grave danger to the health of a resident, emergency surgery may be performed without the consent of the resident if the necessary information is provided to the resident's guardian, including an agency providing guardianship services under contract with the department of developmental disabilities under sections 5123.55 to 5123.59 of the Revised Code, or to the resident's spouse or next of kin to enable that person or agency to give an informed, intelligent, and knowing written consent. If the guardian, spouse, or next of kin cannot be contacted through exercise of reasonable diligence, or if the guardian, spouse, or next of kin is contacted, but refuses to consent, then the emergency surgery may be performed upon the written authorization of the chief medical officer and after court approval has been obtained. However, if delay in obtaining court approval would create a grave danger to the life of the resident, the chief medical officer may authorize surgery, in writing, without court approval. If the surgery is authorized without court approval, the chief medical officer who made the authorization and the physician who performed the surgery shall each execute an affidavit describing the circumstances constituting the emergency and warranting the surgery and the circumstances warranting their not obtaining prior court approval. The affidavit shall be filed with the probate court or criminal court with which the request for prior approval would have been filed within five court days after the surgery, and a copy of the affidavit shall be placed in the resident's file and shall be given to the guardian, spouse, or next of kin of the resident, to the hospital at which the surgery was performed, and to the Ohio protection and advocacy system created by section 5123.60 of the Revised Code. (E) This chapter does not authorize any form of compulsory medical or psychiatric treatment of any resident who is being treated by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing. Sec. 5123.89. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Family" means a parent, brother, sister, spouse, son, daughter, grandparent, aunt, uncle, or cousin. (2) "Payment" means activities undertaken by a service provider or government entity to obtain or provide reimbursement for services provided to a person. (3) "Treatment" means the provision of services to a person, including the coordination or management of services provided to the person. (B) All certificates, applications, records, and reports made for the purpose of this chapter, other than probate court or criminal court journal entries or probate court or criminal court docket entries, that directly or indirectly identify a resident or former resident of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities or person whose institutionalization has been sought under this chapter shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person except in the following situations: (1) It is the judgment of the probate court or criminal court for judicial records, and the managing officer for institution records, that disclosure is in the best interest of the person identified, and that person or that person's guardian or, if that person is a minor, that person's parent or guardian consents. (2) Disclosure is provided for in other sections of this chapter. (3) Disclosure is of a record deposited with the Ohio history connection pursuant to division (C) of section 5123.31 of the Revised Code and the disclosure is made to the closest living relative of the person identified, on the relative's request. (4) Disclosure is needed for the treatment of a person who is a resident or former resident of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities or a person whose institutionalization has been sought under this chapter or is needed for the payment of services provided to the person. (5) Disclosure is needed for a guardianship proceeding under Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code. (C) The department of developmental disabilities shall adopt rules with respect to the systematic and periodic destruction of residents' records. (D) Upon the death of a resident or former resident of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities or a person whose institutionalization was sought under this chapter, the managing officer of an institution shall provide access to the certificates, applications, records, and reports made for the purposes of this chapter to the resident's, former resident's, or person's guardian if the guardian makes a written request. If a deceased resident, former resident, or person whose institutionalization was sought under this chapter did not have a guardian at the time of death, the managing officer shall provide access to the certificates, applications, records, and reports made for purposes of this chapter to a member of the person's family, upon that family member's written request. (E) No person shall reveal the contents of a record of a resident except as authorized by this chapter. Sec. 5123.92. If an affidavit alleging that a person has an intellectual disability and is subject to institutionalization by court order is filed, according to the provisions of section 5123.71 of the Revised Code, in the probate division court or criminal court of a county within the institutional district but not in the county within which the institution is located, and if such person is detained in the institution, the probate division court or criminal court of the county in which the institution is located shall, upon the request of the probate division receiving the affidavit, hold a hearing and make a disposition of the person in accordance with the procedures prescribed by this chapter. Sec. 5123.95. The probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court, upon making an order institutionalizing a person under this chapter, shall forthwith transmit copies, under the judge's official seal, of court papers in the case, including the certificate of the expert witnesses, and of the judge's findings in the case to the managing officer of the institution for persons with intellectual disabilities. If not otherwise furnished, the probate judge shall see that each person institutionalized under section 5123.76 of the Revised Code is properly attired for transportation and, in addition, the institution shall be furnished a complete change of clothing for such person, which shall be paid for on the certificate of the probate judge and the order of the county auditor from the county treasury. The clothing shall be new or as good as new. The managing officer of the institution need not receive the person without such clothing. Upon institutionalization, the managing officer of the institution to which the individual is admitted shall take possession of all money and other valuables that may be upon the person of the individual and shall, within ten days, file a list thereof with the probate judge of the county of which the individual is a resident. If the amount of money is fifty dollars or less it shall be retained and expended by the managing officer of the institution for the benefit of the individual. Unless a guardian of the estate of the individual has already been appointed, the probate judge may, upon the judge's own motion and without notice, appoint a special guardian of the estate of the individual. Any special guardian, before being appointed, shall file a bond approved by the probate judge in the same amount as is required by section 2109.04 of the Revised Code. A special guardian as provided for in this section, and while acting as such, shall be governed by all laws applicable to guardians of the estates of incompetents. The special guardian shall be allowed such compensation for the special guardian's services as the probate court or criminal court thinks reasonable, providing the special guardian forthwith performs all the duties incumbent upon the special guardian. Sec. 5123.96. Costs, fees, and expenses of all proceedings held under this chapter shall be paid as follows: (A) To police and health officers, other than sheriffs or their deputies, the same fees allowed to constables, to be paid upon the approval of the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court; (B) To sheriffs or their deputies, the same fees allowed for similar services in the court of common pleas, county court, or municipal court; (C) To physicians or licensed clinical psychologists acting as expert witnesses and to other expert witnesses designated by the court, an amount determined by the probate court or criminal court; (D) To witnesses in an administrative proceeding, the same fees and mileage as are provided to witnesses by section 119.094 of the Revised Code, and to witnesses in a judicial proceeding, the same fees and mileage as are provided to witnesses by section 2335.06 of the Revised Code, to be paid upon the approval of the probate judge of a probate court or a criminal court; (E) To a person, other than the sheriff or the sheriff's deputies, for taking a person with an intellectual disability to an institution or removing a person with an intellectual disability from an institution, the actual necessary expenses incurred, specifically itemized, and approved by the probate judge of a probate court or a criminal court; (F) To assistants who convey persons with intellectual disabilities to institutions when authorized by the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court, a fee set by the probate court, provided the assistants are not drawing a salary from the state or any political subdivision of the state, and their actual necessary expenses incurred, provided that the expenses are specifically itemized and approved by the probate judge of the probate court or the criminal court; (G) To an attorney appointed by the probate division court or criminal court for an indigent who allegedly is a person with an intellectual disability pursuant to any section of this chapter, the fees that are determined by the probate division court or criminal court. When those indigent persons are before the court, all filing and recording fees shall be waived. (H) To a referee who is appointed to conduct proceedings under this chapter that involve a respondent whose domicile is or, before the respondent's institutionalization, was not the county in which the proceedings are held, compensation as fixed by the probate division court or criminal court, but not more than the compensation paid for similar proceedings for respondents whose domicile is in the county in which the proceedings are held; (I) To a court reporter appointed to make a transcript of proceedings under this chapter, the compensation and fees allowed in other cases under section 2101.08 of the Revised Code. All costs, fees, and expenses described in this section, after payment by the county from appropriations pursuant to section 2101.11 of the Revised Code, shall be certified by the county auditor to the department of developmental disabilities within two months of the date the costs, fees, and expenses are incurred by the county. Payment shall be provided for by the director of budget and management upon presentation of properly verified vouchers. The director of developmental disabilities may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement the payment of costs, fees, and expenses under this section. Sec. 5123.97. In cases of proceedings held under this chapter, the probate judge of a probate court or a criminal court shall file and preserve all papers filed with himthe judge and make such entries upon histhe judge's docket as, together with the papers so filed, will constitute a complete record of each case determined by himthe judge. Section 2. That existing sections 149.43, 2101.24, 2108.90, 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.401, 5122.01, 5122.02, 5122.03, 5122.05, 5122.09, 5122.10, 5122.11, 5122.111, 5122.112, 5122.12, 5122.13, 5122.14, 5122.141, 5122.15, 5122.20, 5122.23, 5122.25, 5122.26, 5122.27, 5122.271, 5122.29, 5122.31, 5122.311, 5122.35, 5122.36, 5122.38, 5122.41, 5122.43, 5123.01, 5123.21, 5123.39, 5123.57, 5123.58, 5123.61, 5123.70, 5123.71, 5123.73, 5123.74, 5123.75, 5123.76, 5123.79, 5123.81, 5123.811, 5123.86, 5123.89, 5123.92, 5123.95, 5123.96, and 5123.97 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 5122.11 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as amended by both H.B. 281 and S.B. 2 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 5122.111 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as amended by both H.B. 281 and S.B. 2 of the 134th General Assembly.